After the workshop at Whitby Jean wanted a word with me but didn't get the chance as we had to head off home and she was helping another lady so she said she'd email me.........I recieved it a few days later asking me to join her team at Crafty Individulas .......to say I was thrilled is an understatement, I'm still on cloud nine now. Thought I'd show you the photos of the clock I made, if you pop over to The CI blog you'll see some of the other ladies finished ones as well, the challenge this month is 'Time for Summer', and not only that there is Candy to be had......yummy ends midnight tonight so what you waiting for, the goodies are scrumptious including some of the new stamps
The last couple of January's I've blogged my 'best albums' of the previous year. This year I'm doing it slightly different and it also ties in with the 'annual Christmas lads meet up' (oh ok, piss up!)... and what a great turn out this year I might add, as well as the regular 'locals' we managed to get Paul T down from London, John F down from Brighton and Terry H down from Leicester! Top work!
A family holiday on the Scottish coast, where Ceri's American half-sister Ruth is living, causes Ceri's real and imaginary worlds to collide. There she encounters a local man, Euan, who swims with the seals and seems to communicate with them. He empathises with Ceri, and she is instantly drawn to him. But Euan, she soon realises, is Ruth's boyfriend - her lover - though Ruth is afraid of the sea and tries to keep Euan away from it. Ceri's feelings of rivalry with her sister are intense but only half-acknowledged; the author conveys these emotions without ever bringing them into the open.
When I look at the news of the Occupy Wall Street protesters today I see the result of, not politics, but a generation of parenting the "entitled generation".
Your spirit has traveled both long and afar.
*Of course Betty can’t help but polishing off Sally’s ice cream sundae on top of her own after the younger Draper informs her mother that she’s full. (Sad trombone.)
But I do promise that through it all I’ll be there to explain.
So was the Brazilian approach better? The arrival time was much better. The act of eating buffet appetizers was not. I still had those awkward conversations attempted in Portuguese over the sound of screaming children and video games, as well as those awkward conversations even in English (I really think, as a culture, the Brazilians don’t get my sense of humor). But my daughter had fun and we spent a Saturday night together, which of course, offsets any of the inconveniences.
1-18 Pensacola, FL Pensacola Civic Center
I 'll try my best to get them answered.
(Text continues after the photos - these photos are mine, from before the show began; do excuse the poor quality - proper photos follow at the end...)
Hindon was taken in by the Irish Americans and lived between Europe and the States until 1910 when Union was declared. In 1911 Louis Botha, the Prime Minister of the new Union, lifted the ban on Hindon who was by then seriously ill. Hindon returned to Middelburg in the Transvaal where John Tower Blake, an American living in South Africa, gave him a rent free home to live in. This home was known as Blake House.
NOSQL continues to gather momentum in the Skills Matter community. In 2011, Skills Matter ran our first ever NOSQL eXchange with talks from Jim Webber, Emil Eifrem, Russell Brown, Brendan McAdams, Dave Gardner, Ian Robinson, Aleksa Vukotic, Robert Rees and Tom Wilkie. We covered everything from MongoDB to Neo4j, from Riak to Scala, and Cassandra to CouchDB. It was a day to live in infamy.
Needless to say, I haven't been blog stalking, creating, or posting much this week. I've been in my own little world for the most part. I don't have anything new to share with you, but in case you missed my Fan Only Freebie on my Facebook page. You can download it here. You must like my page in order to download it.
I really don't know what year these are from. The plastic container says '70s to me, but the picture of the lady says '40s, but it wasn't uncommon for companies to use the same illustration for a beauty product for years, like hair net companies. I am not actually suggesting this specific product either. The description mentions rust, which I wouldn't suggest putting in your hair. There is a reason for me pointing these out though. You can get hair bling like this at stores like Claire's and online that twist into your hair and hold into place. I just think it would be a very elegant addition to a fancy dress if you and your beau are going out for a nice dinner.
Then tonight, this bible verse stuck out at me.....
For the front of the mailbox I decided to add a large heart diecut with Spellbinders Classic Hearts and matted onto Spellbinders Classic Scallop Hearts. The sentiment "Happy Valentines Day" is also part of the "Winter Words" set. Don't you just love this font!!! Another cool part of this set are these cute little sentiments (Be Mine, Love U, XOXO) They are really tiny but such a great addition.
If you haven’t seen the eyeshadow quad, this is how it looks like. The perfect quad for the spring as an everyday look. I’ve never liked anything with an orange hint to it. Funny, as I grow older, I seem to like everything I don’t fancy.
1. Silence, the Final Frontier: Where No Woman Has Gone Before
I'm still fantasizing about the day that I can wear my old clothes. Or even normal sized clothes and not XL. Every 2 weeks or so, my boyfriend has to remind me about my little 'stache and I get all crazy on him out of embarrassment, but I wax it and forget about it.
Level 6: MP Cost: 27, Damage: 316%, Attacks up to 6 enemies.
Two feet that were about to seriously consider buying a big light therapy box, two meters by four. And Prozac. In quantity!
I've been spending my evenings prepping for the first install over at my sister's place. Remember I told you we were planning some updates? We're starting with the Master Bedroom first, because let's face it- if Mom's happy, everyone is happy right? My sister works so hard and my hope is that this little update will give her a relaxing respite at the end of her hectic day.
I haven't been motivated to post anything personal,
beneath my feet is shaking–
Now the problems that can arise from there is simply that the driver gets corrupted or there is a problem when a software conflict comes about. One thing you need to know is how to troubleshoot these kinds of problems and when you need to, all you need to do really is to update the software of the driver or install some fresh ones. Anything above that requires that you actually contact the manufacturer or perhaps enlist the help of your local tech expert. In the end of the day, all devices and gadgets are built to eventually fail, so accept it and your best guard are driver updates.
What a Woman (1943)
Here’s the thing – I’d actually done most of my research years ago. While writing my first adult horror book, I’d had this very minor witch character called Elspeth, the Isle Witch. She’d existed at the time of the English Civil War persecutions, so I did a lot (probably far too much, in fact!) research on what life would have been like for her at the time. So when it came to these books I already had most of my old notes stored away.
P.G. Wodehouse is recognized as the greatest English comic writer of the twentieth century, rightly admired throughout the world and translated into more than thirty languages. Launched on the twenty-fifth anniversary of his death, this series presents each Overlook Wodehouse as the finest edition of the master’s work ever published— beautifully designed and faithful to the original.
1 1/2 cups (375 mL) all-purpose flour
Whew, now that the NBA playoffs have begun to overlap the NHL it’s hard to keep up with everything. I picked a good game to not pay attention to last night (Kings-Blues). That was due to the monster doubleheader that TNT provided last night, how can you say no to Heat-Knicks and then Thunder-Mavs? You can’t! (though I will admit as the Heat game hit the 5 minute mark Rangers-Caps made its way onto my main TV).
The true boldness of Mr Cameron’s message lies in his view that non-violent extremism is an entry-chamber for terrorism itself. He blames Islamist doctrine – the political ideology advocated by the Muslim Brotherhood under the cloak, or rather the veil, of religion – as the bad thought from which bad actions naturally spring. It fills the dangerous vacuum created by multi-culturalism. Paranoia about Western governments, anti-Semitism, the oppression of women – all these things fire up young men with hatred of a society they are taught to see as decadent. Soon they are only the click of a mouse away from people who will teach them how to blow themselves up on a crowded train.
Also as part of the EVIDENCE , I have included tissue paper, flowers, oversized flowers and leaves.
Abita Turbo Dog. Nice brew to mimic. Only I have no dogs and twin turbos in my car so I have my own name for the clone. :) Sadly, I've gotten something wild in this one. Has a green apple taste that is mellow and not too bad, but the beer rates "OK if desparate". I get to drink this and think about what went wrong. Or, I get to drink this and think about what might make it drinkable. First thought is to try to get fruit and sour going and turn it into a lambic. It may be that I left it in the primary three weeks and racked straight into a keg. Or it may be that some gunk on my filter lines got a hold here. (I've gotten to the filter line since then)
The animal is said to have escaped before the sentence was carried out.
Melanie Tipton is the Creator, Executive Producer & Cast Member of the politically incorrect Chattanoogaville Television Show that’s about politics and sports. Melanie Tipton graduated from Carson Newman with a B.A. degree in Communications. Melanie Tipton is a former softball player at Carson Newman. Melanie Tipton is a first place Associated Press award winning sports broadcaster with several years of television experience and she lives and breathes politics.
The sun was still out when the first buggies arrived for the evening’s family gathering. Two buggies came in, one right after the other, and then two more arrived fifteen minutes later. Among the guests were Ben and Susan Yoder—Susan was Hannah’s mom’s cousin. Also in attendance were Leroy and John, brothers on her dad’s side, and Mose, Leroy’s brother-in-law. Other people who were in some way connected to the Millers had also been invited. Having a few outside guests allowed for some spontaneity while maintaining some of the structures formed by the natural family. Sam Knepp came that night because one of the cousins had taken the notion to invite him.
Stamp, sentiment inside, Hope Is, Stampin Up
And anyway, it's horrendously hot there in summer. And expensive. And then you've got the forest fires. And the Mistral. Flies, if not mosquitoes. No, I think my way of "doing" Provence is much better. And cheaper.
“There is some justification at least in the taunt that many of the pretending defenders of ‘free enterprise’ are in fact defenders of privileges and advocates of government activity in their favor rather than opponents of all privilege. In principle the industrial protectionism and government-supported cartels and the agricultural policies of the conservative groups are not different from the proposals for a more far-reaching direction of economic life sponsored by the socialists. It is an illusion when the more conservative interventionists believe that they will be able to confine these government controls to the particular kinds of which they approve. In a democratic society, at any rate, once the principle is admitted that the government undertakes responsibility for the status and position of particular groups, it is inevitable that this control will be extended to satisfy the aspirations and prejudices of the great masses. There is no hope of a return to a freer system until the leaders of the movement against state control are prepared first to impose upon themselves that discipline of a competitive market which they ask the masses to accept.” – F. A. Hayek
Organized by Dr. Ken Kelly and historian Jane Aldrich, historical consultant here in Charleston, the group consisted of Ahmed Tijane Cisse, Minister of Culture and Heritage from the republic of Guinea, El Hadj Ibrahima Fall, the Rector of the Nelson Mandela University in Conakry, the capital of Guinea, and Mr. Moussa Fofana, the son of the Chief of Farenya, plus several of Dr. Kelly’s graduate students. Since French is the national language of Guinea, an interpreter was needed. Although I spoke French fluently 40 years ago, I’ve become somewhat rusty, so I was delighted to have Dr. Kelly’s wife, Cecile, as our interpreter. She spoke beautiful French, and the visit gave me the opportunity to converse in French from time to time, which I enjoyed thoroughly.
Level 2: Potions Recover 122%.
Until the three of us are left completely sated
Businesses need to realise that being social is not about your organisation having a social media presence just for the brand, but that it means empowering employees to use social media in their every day roles to influence, engage and join in conversations about business needs and opportunities. This is what leads to a social business. There are very few businesses that can truly say they are a “social business”; the businesses that spring to mind that are truly social are those who have built their businesses on social technologies; for example Facebook, Twitter and LinkedIn to mention a few. If businesses choose to always do what they have always done, then they can only ever expect to get the same results. Businesses should ultimately look to achieve being a social business within three to five years. The first step would be to look at social media as a new communication channel, which opens up new opportunities for businesses. Gone are the days where marketing is used in the traditional sense, and classed as a cost centre function. Marketing now needs to prove itself and show return on investment, a contribution to the bottom line and add value to sales pipeline. Social marketing allows for greater engagement in the buyers journey along with assisting the humanisation of brands. Next step is empowering your employees to be your brand advocates and utilise the social channels in their everyday work. Finally encourage your customers to actively be social with you and engage and leverage your content for their benefit.
Howe has long exhibited a talent for the 200 meters. He ran 20.99 as a 16 year old a decade ago, and followed up with 20.28 as a 19 year old, He still sits at #12 all time as a Junior in spite of running the event only “part time”! The names of those who performed better as a junior include Francis Obikwelu (20.24), Joe Deloach (20.24), Dwayne Evans (20.22), Walter Dix (20.18), and Usain Bolt (19.93). All Olympic medalists in the event and all but Evans sub20 performers.
My Darling, This is to tell you in a very mild way how terribly much I love you, miss you, need you and want you near me always. Safe trip my love. Rest, relax and think of me burning myself out with this terrible longing of you, for you. I love you so.
Even when things are at their worst, God is still in control. Otherwise He would not be God. Looking at Acts 27:16; things are going from bad to worse. They have lost control of the ship in the violent storm.
After seven years as an animal control officer, Frank Ringelberg believes his department recorded a first this week, and in the process, sent a message to all would-be animal abusers.
I'm that mom who always lets her kids play in her closet and dress up in her clothes.
It caused our crew to come with a plan to stop Alaric’s heart. Klaus got in the middle of that when he had planned to skip town with Elena. Since she was now in Alaric’s grasp, Klaus couldn’t do much but help the team out. But not before Klaus tried to them aware how eager he was about finding Elena.
But how can I do it? I‘ve got things to do!
Miss G has a seascape today. Now that we’re back to school it’s “S” week. The water is blue colored barley. The starfish is an almond butter and jam on whole wheat pita, the sun is a yellow tomato, the waves and whale are made from Veggy brand soy “cheese” and the whale’s eye is a piece of quinoa. The top right are watermelon stars and on the bottom right are green grapes and a plum octopus with Veggy cheese eyes and mouth all packed in her Easy Lunch Box.
The recipe calls for pears or she says you can use apples. I didn't have any pears - had an apple. I tried one bite with the apple, but enjoyed it much more without any fruit. I couldn't stop refilling my plate!
The point is that the broadest measures of the money supply (M2 and M3) vastly overstate how much “real money” actually exists in the system.
They tell me I’m lazy — can learn if I try –
My limbs beating time with the tentacles of trees.
That was so much fun I'm going to do it all over tomorrow. Except then we'll be discussing boiling. Can't wait.
I've been on a quest to find the best guacamole recipe since our trip to Mexico a month ago. For some reason, nothing I attempted had quite enough flavor. Little did I know, the answer was right under my nose (and in my pantry) all along - shallots! I love cooking with shallots. They have a taste somewhere in between onions and garlic and I find them to have a slight peppery note. The basil is also lends nice freshness to the guac. I also added some chopped tomatoes.
The term “heat” refers to a single race. A “dead heat” is a common expression used in horse racing to describe a “tie.”
- A real mixed bag in terms of genre: 2 books I'd consider for children, but at very different ends of the spectrum; 3 YA that cover fantasy, thriller and historical; a horror; 2 chick lit; 1 historical. I didn't settle at all to one particular genre this month!
Jonathan Croes
Thus Melzar took away the portion of their meat, and the wine that they should drink; and gave them pulse.
10:59 PM – The birthday boy is back…or not. Johnny and Lesnar are dumbfounded by Cena no- showing. Lesnar takes the mic and tries to draw Cena out by calling him scared, and saying he has no balls. Cena still does not make an appearance, so Lesnar decides that he has some business he would like to discuss with Johnny. Lesnar has some changes that he would like to see. Lesnar has not been happy with his return, so he has a few demands for Johnny Ace, and he wants these changes in place before Sunday. His list of changes begins with Johnny being told he must run all major decision through Brock. Lesnar would also like to use Vince McMahon’s private jet to travel to and from RAW. Another of Lesnar’s demands is that he will appear on RAW when he wants, and of course, Brock also wants more money. Lesnar goes on to say that he will not wrestle on Sunday until all of his demands are met. Johnny has no choice but to agree to Lesnar’s terms. Once Johnny agrees, Lesnar signs the contract for Sunday.
measuring the sky,
Egg - 1
You haven’t seen a tree until you’ve seen its shadow from the sky. __Amelia Earhart
There have been so many. But one has stuck in my mind for many years. It's a long story, so in order to cut it short, I'll go back in time and place myself on the corner of 23rd Avenue and L St, bang in the heart of the borough of Vedado, Havana, in the mid 90s ('94 or '95). It's early December and therefore the Latin American Film Festival is in full swing. I've just finished watching my fourth flick that day and I'm trying to hitch a ride from the Yara movie theatre to the Charles Chaplin cinémathèque. It's early evening and a Cubanacán taxi stops at the traffic lights. I know it's very unlikely the driver will allow me in, but then I notice that on the front seat is Danny Glover. Danny Glover! Sitting comfortably on the front seat of a Cuban taxi (albeit for foreigners). His family is in the back, the lights are about to change, I need to get to the Chaplin pronto, I'm still gobsmacked and out comes the fateful phrase: "Danny, man, I love you!" Yes, me, cinephile, long-time admirer of one half of the "Lethal Weapon" franchise, makes a fool of myself right there on the corner of 23rd Avenue and L St. I mean to say, obviously: "Danny, man, I love your movies", but the famous US actor just smiles, the taxi driver revs up the engine and as soon as light changes to green, he disappears, leaving a twenty-something-year-old man wondering whether Danny Glover thought for a moment that I was coming on to him.
Jules and Jim made its U.S. premiere April 23, 1962, the same year the film made its initial debut in France on Jan. 23. Though it marked Truffaut's third feature film as a director following The 400 Blows and Shoot the Piano Player, Jules and Jim was only the second of his films to reach U.S. movie theaters. Shoot the Piano Player, though it opened elsewhere in 1960, wouldn't get its U.S. release until July 23, 1962. (Like Jules and Jim, The 400 Blows reached U.S. shores in the same year, 1959, that Truffaut's directing debut did elsewhere, just a few months later.) As I remind people as often as possible, all opinions about movies are subjective. Before beginning my lovesick tribute to what I think holds the title as the true masterpiece born of the French New Wave, I feel that I shouldn't pretend all critics agreed about Jules and Jim and I'd allow one to have his say before I got started. "With the years, I've sometimes felt the reputation of Jules and Jim is a bit exaggerated," this former critic said to Richard Roud, then-director of the New York Film Festival, in October 1977 on a television program called Camera Three. The ex-critic added, "and that I was too young when I made it." That appearance happened to be François Truffaut's first time on American television. I guess you can remove the man from the role of film critic but you can't take the critic out of the man. "I continue to re-read the book every year. It was one of my favorites. I've often felt that the film was too decorative, not cruel enough, that love was crueler that that," Truffaut went on to tell Roud. Now, François, don't be so hard on yourself. For those who haven't seen Jules and Jim, I'll be vague, I think you could call the film's dénouement fairly devastating. Besides, most recognize (or know from experience) that cruelty usually crosses love's path at some point. On top of that, the subject cuts too close to Truffaut for him to judge. Jules and Jim may speak to me in personal ways, but that isn't why the film rests among my 20 favorite films of all time. As John Houseman used to claim in TV commercials about how Smith Barney made money, Jules and Jim got that rank on my list "the old-fashioned way. It earned it."
Lips touch,
Pew said the number of adults co-habitating, single-person households and single parents had meanwhile increased in recent decades.
2. Patent trolls--It is well-known that certain companies and law firms pursue patent litigation on the basis of a granted patent for which the patentee is not making any use thereof. Loud voices were raised about such conduct amounting to a perversion of the patent system. Whether or not public criticism was a factor, it remains that the U.S. Supreme Court, in the case of eBay Inc. v. MercExchange, L.L.C here, limited the ability of a plaintiff to use the patent system to extract a monetary settlement in circumstances where there was not exploitation of the patent by the patentee. Neither the navigator of the submarine patent or the alleged patent troll was said to have broken any law, but merely to have adroitly exploited it for his ultimate monetary benefit.
Simple living is best.
Anyone who lives in a rural area will tell you that fast road links and a network of dual carriageways are something that the rest of the country takes for granted. If you're seriously injured round here and need ambulance transport it can take half an hour to get to Whitehaven, an hour to reach the big hospital at Carlisle and heaven help you if your condition needs treatment in Newcastle - that's a three hour trip.
16For all who do such things, and all whose ways are not upright, are disgusting to the Lord your God.
“There is no one holy like the LORD; there is no one besides you; there is no Rock like our God. 1 Samuel 2:2
Mors mon nez
Writers: Thornton Wilder (book), Michael Stewart (book of stage play), Ernest Lehman, Johann Nestroy
Last week I felt that I had completely lost my passion for the music. My oversaturated hard drive crashed, taking away years of music collecting (despite the valiant efforts of my IT husband). Including all the originals I have posted here in the past. I found I really didn't care that much, and everything I was able to rescue started to bore me as well. I went to a favorite record store and was ready to walk out empty handed, and had to force myself to buy two albums I would have been crazy-excited to share not so long ago. This is the first (the second will be nowhere near as good). And the way things are feeling for me, this could very well be my last post here. I would much rather pull the plug on the whole blog myself and maintain what little bit of control I still have.
Near Chichester on the Goodwood Estate, the CASS Sculpture Foundation uses its 26 acre grounds to display ‘an ever-changing display of 80 monumental sculptures, all of which are available for sale with the proceeds going directly to artists’.
Row 13- ch1, turn, sc dec, sc in 9. (10)
- I called you daddy, -
Viviana
Discerning what is and what is not an authentic movement of the Holy Spirit is made more challenging for us when outside money, politics, and secular moralism enter into an equation that is supposed to involve the prayerful study of God's Holy Word by believers in that Word. When a spirit of the age is in conflict with scripture, it is the new spirit that is to be revised, not Holy Scripture, but when powerful forces want a new spirit to be legalized, and the Church has been sufficiently weakened in its confidence of what we used to call the "Gospel truth," the progressive strategy works amazingly well.
Now for this week’s Tuesday Sketch Challenge #89 (long card):
It's meaning is "The rash or inexperienced will attempt things that wiser people are more cautious of."
- Put up the Christmas tree, each child has to make an ornament for the tree
Just like humans, plants love to bask in sunlight. Try to find a place near a window where natural light shines in. Plants use light for photosynthesis, the process of converting water into minerals for food.
Since Zuma’s ascension, wealth transfer in South Africa is expected to accelerate considerably and to resemble ever more closely the unabashed confiscation and dispossession brought about by Robert Mugabe in Zimbabwe. “Mandela, Mbeki, And Mugabe Sitting In A Baobab Tree K-I-S-S-I-N-G,” or Chapter Four, analyzes the significance of the unqualified support Zuma’s predecessors, Mandela and Mbeki, have lent the Zimbabwean dictator Robert Mugabe over the decades. “If you want to see the future of South Africa, it might not be a bad idea to look at the present in Zimbabwe.”
Section 3 would contain the players that didn’t enter the previous sections. This is the section of players that featured sparingly for Arsenal this season; Gibbs, Denilson, Farmer Eboue and Bendtner. Gibbs was more or less a cup player this season because he featured in Arsenal’s Carling Spoon and FA Cup encounters but he hasn’t really shown that he’s good enough to usurp Clichy in the starting lineup. It’s obvious that he’s Clichy’s deputy because I don’t believe that Armand Traore will be good enough to replace him but Gibbs has this knack for always getting injured. There was a period Clichy was out thereby giving Gibbs the opportunity to stake his claim for a first team place but he injured himself. This made Arsenal deploy Farmer Eboue to the left back position. Still sticking with the Farmer, he has been linked to our bitter rivals Tottenham but it seems as if a move to the other side of North London might be a possibility because Arsenal has almost secured the services of the gifted Carl Jenkinson who’s adept in both full back positions. Denilson is a defensive midfielder that knows how to dictate the tempo of a game but he has too many flaws. He’ll be best suited in a club that has no ambition to win anything such as Fulham or Wigan and the rest of the mid-table Premier League lot. He’s one player whose departure will not mean much to the Arsenal faithful.
Ken White - Drums
19) I know quite a lot about most of the world's religions, even the obscure ones.
things have gone to the dogs
This is because the ECL has a wider meaning from causality. Let’s say you give an effort of 100 to someone, you’re nor guaranteed to receive 100 back from the same person only; you might receive less than 100, but from different people, and in the end, it will still sum to 100.
These days the lips can get to taste more than sausages in this historic beer hall. The building was raised in 1892 by the former Schous brewery. Prior to its latest refurbishment Olympen used to be one of the brownest cafés around, a place where nicotine stains would be your stamps of approval. There are nine big paintings on the walls with motives from this poor neighbourhood a century ago, and they all had to undergo extensive cleaning as part of the refurbishment.
actually tal, i just thought once you plant them, why not just cut them and leave the root in?! then you can just keep cutting and regrowing! Also, they can be called scallions, as i'm sure as an american you know ;)
This event was of a smaller scale as only 400 people were admitted and it is 2NE1′s 2nd time to have such a small concert in Japan.
“Why aren’t you out there fishing?” he asked.
Danielle, please email Claire at: jellypark@live.co.uk and let her know which digi image from the Jellypark store you would like. All three of you may grab the winner's badge for your blog from over on the right sidebar. Congratulations!
The pink arrow is the portion I have been working on for the last 2 weeks.
and her waiting is rewarded
The police in Oxford have arrested a group of thirteen men on suspicion of trafficking under aged girls for the purpose of sex and prostitution. The men are additionally suspected of grooming the children, supplying them with drugs and also of rape.
and the sun forms the halo in the soft rain.
At the park:
Just as planned, 'Rain and Mare picked us up from the KOA at 6:30 PM and we went to a nearby Applebee's for dinner. It was so great to see them! We exchanged news about children, husbands (a mixed bag), parents, and other friends. Although 32 years have gone by, we slipped right back into our friendship... isn't that amazing and wonderful? And Lynda was such a good sport - she sat quietly and just absorbed as much as she could.
He pointed to the words “United States of America” on the front.
The undead are a majority of playable-race raid bosses. It’s really no surprise that no one trusts them, it turns out, since about half of the playable humanoid raid bosses are undead. One could argue that it’s not fair to lump all forsaken in with all undead, and it’s really not clear if they’ve got the free will to stop fighting if they wanted to. Still, just to count, Naxxramas has 3 wings of undead bosses, plus the last two bosses at the end, totaling 14 (counting the horsemen separately), and even if you cut all the weird undead that are no longer really humanoid, you have Razuvious, Heigan, Noth, Gothik, and the Four horsemen, totaling 8.
Whatever wickedness they do is no worse than the murder of God and whatever “justice” we can pour out is nothing compared to the wrath of God.
Saturday evening, on my way home, I received a text from Albert: ‘Can’t wait to cuddle up with you later! xxx’. Albert had been away for a few days, staying with his parents, and I assumed, because of our arrangement, that he might try to get laid. The arrangement was that we were both free to sleep with others, as long as we used protection and didn’t bring anyone home.
Ooodles of quilt labels, to bring my feathered friends to life!
Before we get too far ahead of ourselves on this fine morning a few questions are in order. Are you addicted to over training and injuring yourself? We know you don’t do it on purpose and repeatedly injuring yourself is unintentional, or is it? What we are trying to discuss with you this morning is that the outcome of your self-injury often leaves a permanent mark on your life. Whether or not your intentions were pure in the first place.
once finished, i added red craft paint on the sides for an extra punch.
ahhhhh, i know i play favorites a lot, but i really love this room.
Maybe all restrooms need to be designed like this one...
They had no clue that one bank, New York-based Morgan Stanley (MS), took $107 billion in Fed loans in September 2008, enough to pay off one-tenth of the country’s delinquent mortgages. The firm’s peak borrowing occurred the same day Congress rejected the proposed TARP bill, triggering the biggest point drop ever in the Dow Jones Industrial Average. (INDU) The bill later passed, and Morgan Stanley got $10 billion of TARP funds, though Paulson said only “healthy institutions” were eligible.
Molson Coors has come up with a different angle: bloating.
In my spare time, I have been tackling our forward head - which really needs varnished. So far, it is going well. Next job - the galley - yikes.
In the speech, beamed back to prime-time evening audiences in US, the president said that at the upcoming Nato summit, to be held in Chicago, the alliance would “set a goal for Afghan forces to be in the lead for combat operations across the country next year”.
And tell me everything
You can't believe how hard
The majority believes that as already stated, Act No. 671 was in force only until Congress could meet resume its legislatives functions. Naturally, this view is based on the theory that legislative functions in times of emergency are delegated only because of the inability of the Legislative Department to meet and exercise its functions. I believe I have successfully demonstrated the flaw in this theory, not only by showing that the real reason underlying the delegation of legislative powers is not inability of Legislature to meet but rather it inability to consider and pass legislation in time to meet an emergency which requires as it does urgent and immediate action and can be solved only by the exercise of legislative functions by one single responsible individual, unhamppered by study and prolonged discussion by many members of the legislative body, but also by the fact that although since 1939 when the second world war broke out in Europe and for a period of more than two years thereafter, when the National Assembly could still meet and in fact convened on several occasions and for hundreds of days in regular and special session, nevertheless, it had been delegating legislative powers to the President.
Next to the last day! I took up the first half hour discussing more on beer styles, trying to link characteristics to those we'd tried during the course. I showed the students a couple of beer websites (like RateBeer and Beer Advocate that have their own style guides but are both influenced by the Beer Judge Certification Program guidelines.
As an editor, you have to put yourself in the place of a moviegoer and ask yourself, “Can I see these things occurring?”
So now, the hard part starts. The hard part would be deciding on how I want to re-do them. There are so many options I am drawn to.
There's just too much to do
“We can still alter our course. It is NOT too late. We still have options. We need the courage to change our values to the regeneration of our families, the life that surrounds us. Given this opportunity, we can raise ourselves. We must join hands with the rest of Creation and speak of Common Sense, Responsibility, Brotherhood, and PEACE. We must understand that The Law *is* the Seed and only as True Partners can we survive.”
As the U.S. homicide rate declines, more people are killing each other and claiming self-defense-a trend most pronounced in states with “stand your ground” laws, reports the Wall Street Journal. These laws, which grant people more leeway to attack kill someone who is threatening them, are attracting scrutiny after the controversial killing of Trayvon Martin, 17, by a Florida neighborhood watchman. Florida has one of the broadest self-defense laws of the 25 states with some version of a “stand your ground” principle. So-called justifiable homicides nearly doubled from 2000 to 2010, when 326 were reported. Over that same period, total killings averaged 16,000 a year.
How would you answer these questions?
Spring Cleansing
Las Vegas has been in the news of late thanks to President Obama’s penchant for saying bad things about it. For an insider’s look at Sin City, there’s Under the Neon Sky: A Las Vegas Doorman’s Story by Jay Rankin ($14.95, Jay Rankin Publishing, softcover). I am breaking my own rule against self-published books because this one is worth reading. “If you step back and look at the marketing, it’s brilliant: the lights, the shows, the food, the entertainment, the rooms, and the views…the possibility of winning big, of getting laid, of doing drugs, and on and on. Even the rush of anticipation you get when you plan a trip to Vegas is addicting.” Las Vegas is a place where some people go to break the rules while others go to attend major conferences and events. I have always had an aversion to gambling, so the allure of that was lost on me, but having been there on business a number of times, I found Rankin’s book a fascinating look at a city that truly never sleeps.
· Knives and sharp utensils can cut and pierce the rubbery silicone. Great care must be taken when using sharp instruments around silicone.
They were aggravating him big time and hanging on to him so they could cash in after his death he told me. One of them he called a dwarf bobblehead who lived off donations from an ailment that he has since he was young, and basically was a deadbeat dad that chased fame & fortune. The other one was as he called an unfortunate hag that he had sex with because he owed her for writing a blog for him. So he wasn’t perturbed when I said how I was going to treat the book he once worshipped. He knew everything I was saying to him was all the truth & he was sick & dying and said I could go after all of them via the book and tell the true story. He just wanted me to promise that I would get the rights to do it legally and not to leave anything
was the best gift this Christmas.
Vacation real estate remains a proverbial hot property in different locations in Italy. In Florence, Venice, Rome and the river crosses Lombard plain to the map parma italy a SIM Locked cell phone, you will notice that the country has its own unique flavors and combinations that are protected by the late sixth century.
Roughly half of the school districts reported that they lacked good information on research-based curriculum and instruction for English learners.
He goes on to explain that one of the reasons he’s not an “atheist” is because the atheists he knows are fervent activists, fighting for that cause, debating god’s existence, etc. But again, that’s not what makes someone an atheist. You can be an atheist and never talk about it with anyone. If you don’t believe god exists, you’re an atheist. End of story. What you do with that belief is your business, but you don’t become a “bigger” atheist because you talk about it openly, and you’re not a “lesser” atheist if you don’t come out of the closet.
Alcohol By Volume: 9.25%
The customer is not always right. And I should know, I spent too many years in retail! As a designer, you do not work alone – believe it or not. Your business is a partnership with your clientele; you both have a vested interest in the result. I’ve heard stories of web designers or illustrators working for hours on a fantastic theme, only to present it to the client and a response of ‘No, I don’t like it, No, thats not what I meant’. And they walk out of the presentation at risk of blowing their resource budget, and perhaps their temper, mumbling under their breath about how little the client knows about good design. But where did it go wrong? Sure it may be an amazing concept, but did you respond to the brief properly? Did you communicate effectively in the first instance, did you have a kick off meeting, and did you keep all lines of communication open with the client? When things like this happen, we often here the lament about the lack of creative freedom. But I have been surprised by clients who had been completely taken by an unusual concept because the designer ‘sold’ it to them. And why were they able to sell it? Because the client trusted his/her opinion, and why again? Because the lines of communication were wide open, the client was able to trust the designer, knowing that every move, intent, and objective had been communicated.
Yaya Toure v Scholes
Jamie Bernadette
“the Scriptures”
Many times we tend to focus on the beginning of this race, or the end; salvation and eternal life have a propensity to run the discussion, when most of us are having trouble just being a Christian and heading out the door. If you are fine with your relationship with God, this book isn’t for you; you are blessed and I envy where you’re at on your journey.
There is a scene where Ran-Hanuel first discovers that he might be in love with Micha and the confusion he feels when he discovers that he might love Micha in her dude persona rather than the girly Michaella. It is written in Micha’s POV, but I’d love to be Ran-Hanuel at this moment.
“The goal of the exhibition is to inspire designers, educators and parents to be more critical of the toys that shape a child’s values and the impact toy making has on the environment.”
Robin Westbrook
-I put my makeup on, in case a good soul decided to come visit me. Two people did. But I didn't do my hair, and it looked like a scarecrow's.
Recently I visited friends who live in a small close-knit village. Last year one of my friends retired and has joined a number of local clubs. One of these clubs is the book club. They meet once a month, choose a book, everyone reads it and over tea and cake they discuss it.
One little boy in front of us couldn't stay in his seat for all the popcorn in the world. His parents would sit him in his seat and -- thunk -- that kid would go straight over sideways onto the floor. Sit up -- thunk -- sit up -- thunk. It would have been downright distracting if my own child hadn't been trying to drink milk through a straw stuck up his nose.
In the Mahajaras Car museum. A converted Elephant stable that hosts 40 cars, planes and a state of the art bar with a centre stage that raises up 15ft at your request. Slightly random and also unexpected on our part mid cocktail.
David Lee Roth – Vocals
It’s not just that Joe Flood can adroitly break down to constituent-level the most difficult stories, it’s that he can do it so interestingly, so well. The Fires could be a companion or lead-up to Mahler’s achingly great Ladies and Gentlemen, the Bronx is Burning: Flood’s The Fires is about the bureaucratic decision-making processes that led to H. Cosell’s statement and the borough’s (and the whole city’s) War Years of tinderbox tendency. This is transfixing story of how the folks who ran NYC in the late-60′s through 70′s, among them Mayor Lindsay and Fire Chief O’Hagan, tried to create and implement new systems for fighting fires in the city. That’s the understatement of all time, for the record: what was actually happening in New York was the same thing as was happening elsewhere, which was that young, idealistic, progress-believing, computer-aided dudes started trying to use statistics and computers to devise/divine new routes and plans for cities to take and follow.
Entry #66
Thanks for stopping by today....I hope your day is super special!!!!
1/2 cup blue cheese, crumbled
Just click on the link below for the recipe from Simply Recipes.
Seniors gather at the Hallmark, their assisted-living facility in Lower Manhattan, for computer classes. They wanted to begin the task of catching up with a technical world whose rapid-fire evolution has left much of America’s oldest generation isolated from its children, grandchildren and tech-savvy friends.
Not looking good, I thought, shouldering my rifles and pulling my Colt .45. I wasn't doin' too bad, but I missed a helluva lot more heads with the .45. Shootin' a moving target in the head ain't easy under the best of conditions. Add to that: adrenaline, fatigue, and the slow and slight but unpredictable jerking of the zombies as they shambled towards me and I was actually surprised I was hittin' approximately 60% of my intended targets.
to her breathy voice
The two doctors are really enjoying this conversation, you can tell by their enthusiasm. I really enjoyed it too. It is a bit long over an hour, but so worth it. Obviously, I have been wound up on the inflammation thing as there is so much to it. So many things can cause it and since it is at the core of so many illnesses, it pays to understand all you can. Dr. Oschman does a very good job explaining something important to us all. It’s worth your time.
Untied but still immobilized by extremely robust hands I am pushed behind the sorceress. Leaving the grove we reach the majestic quadrangular peristyle in whose central garden grass, flowers, fountains and ponds are arranged with elegant symmetry.
It wasn’t until this week that the CPA worked up tentative tax figures for last year and gave Diana the estimate of taxes owed. For me as an individual, owing $1,000+ in taxes at the end of the year is upsetting. Diana’s upset level is higher at maybe $6,000. As a partnership our tax rate is 28%, more or less, and the taxes owed are considerably higher than $6,000. We had a good year, but we aren’t GM or GE or Apple. Diana got the news while she was at the office alone. When I came back from the jobs, she told me the estimated tax in a whisper. “Could this be right? Could we owe this much money?” (It was and we did.)
You'll find the fun has just begun,
and my arms were light. i sat up on the edge of my nest and blinked.
Now he wanders in Vegas, another lied to ghost
Grinning still
Well it’s almost 8 AM central time, in Texas. It’s hump day and its time for some news, or maybe just rants? Whatever the case may be it’s that time! To start of the news, yesterday was May 1 and Call of Duty: Black Ops 2 was revealed! *gasp* Of course everyone knew what it was because of leaked images, and box art. Although, the trailer for Black Ops 2 was very interesting to say the least. It looks as if they are going with a more futuristic approach to this entry. So in essence its a modern warfare style game, but with Black Ops mechanics. I could be wrong, but from my perspective on the trailer,I took hints at how “war is evolving” and the vehicles look very futuristic. I’ve already read so much backlash comparing it to Halo even. The thing that nobody should be doing is taking any denotative meaning from this trailer, as far as we know it may turn out to be totally different from what is intended. We will see come November 13, 2012 when Black Ops 2 officially releases.
Now he’s got a rifle in his hand
Busy mum of three. Fitness instructor. Fashion journalist and blogger. And now boutique owner…What keeps you so full of energy and inspired to take on these challenges? My husband is an entrepreneur and has started many businesses, so I think I can lay a lot of ‘blame’ on him. He is very inspiring and has always pushed me to do things that I myself haven’t even necessarily been aware that I was capable off. We had talked about the idea of a shop in Olney and online but more in terms of maybe doing something when all the kids are in school in a few years time. Then he found a space and said I should do it…and here we are now!It’s all been very quick!
But seriously, this parenting thing is such bullshit! It’s all about abandonment and desertion, it’s heart crushing nonsense. Why would anyone choose to do this to themselves, even look forward to it?
Should've woken up earlier.
You know, it's kind of hard to photograph these headbands without modeling them. I tried about 5 different "poses" to get something that looked sort of normal. :)
Myth #5 – Introverts don’t like to go out in public.
And I just KNOW that all of you really care about my comments and will shed huge alligator tears without them.
Come very very often T________T
The Steampunk Robot Costume
Non-Tippers
In a sauce pan, cook shallot in butter on medium for 2-3 minutes. Add asparagus and cook for 4-5 minutes until it begins to soften. Add flour and cook for 1-2 minutes until it is hot and bubbly. Add chicken stock and half-and-half. Stir until smooth. Bring to a simmer then add spinach. Season to taste.
Jewelry Maker
Drop by later on to see if we had anyone who participated all month long!
This tomato has been growing, blooming, and fruiting for two solid years, completely unattended in a corner of my cold, dry, north-facing dog yard. It gets no attention of any kind, and no water (unless the dogs are "watering" it). In fact, it wasn't even planted here. This is where I dumped the tomato cages after my last aborted attempt to keep the kitchen garden alive. I guess there must have been a seed or two still attached, because this tomato sprouted here, in the gravel, and has been happily growing up the unused cages every spring and summer since. In winter it goes semi-dormant, then comes back with fresh new growth in the spring and starts putting out tomatoes again. This will be its third year running, and as you can see, it is well into its spring growth cycle.
The thing here is I am not doing book reviews anymore. *insert ‘awwwwwww’* BECAUSE…wait for it.. NO ONE READS THEM! I do NOT get any views on those posts. So, what is the big deal.?
I can make sure that you are actually following.
Do you talk about your favorite sport or team?
All I ever wanted was to be loved and accepted by you…to be what you wanted….to be enough…to grow old with you…all I ever wanted was the man that I fell in love with….but, he went away. I would get my hopes up every time he returned…only to be let down again when he left….and I would wait patiently, just for a glimpse of him….until those glimpses became less and less clear… until he finally disappeared and I lost all hope.
I’m not sure where this stuff comes from. Who said Christians aren’t the ones who ‘love people’? I think the only problem right now is that there are a bunch of important people who are trying to convince the world that Christians don’t love all sorts of people. I serve in a church, I have for the past 12 years or so, and I have never met a single person in any of the churches I have served who has hated any of the above groups mentioned. In fact, I have found it to be quite the opposite: We tend to love the sinners more than we do one another. The problem that Christians have is not that we don’t love the sinners–oh, we are only too eager to do that!–our problem is that we don’t love one another. Calvinists battle with Arminians. Lutherans battle with Baptists. Pre-tribbers battle with A-tribbers. Instrumentalists battle with non-instrumentalists. Emergents battle with, well, everyone else. Catholics battle with Protestants. Free-willers battle with Sovereign Gracers. It is a rather sickening cycle and truth, but it is true: Christians don’t like one another. That, in a nutshell, is the largest part of our problem right now. And I submit to you that the world will become richer, more harmonious, more peaceful, when Christians learn to love one another per the command of Jesus.
I’ll take you where real animals are playing
No one will be there to meet him.
11:30 - Questions
My relationship with Coronet restaurant began when a bunch of my seniors (Praveen, Dexter, and others), took me to the restaurant during the ‘initiation process’ (a.k.a mental disintegration process) that was customary at the college, and asked me to ‘wait’ at their table while they sat, chatted and happily enjoyed the fish buryaani.
Subways OK--really?
I added a piece of feather trim with another key tucked in on top of it. Also below the feathers is a fancy button on top of some rushed fiber from the challenge package.
Its convener Lachlan Dunjey, a right-to-life campaigner who has run as a Senate candidate for the Christian Democratic Party, told ABC News Radio the group was concerned about the health consequences for children of gay marriages.
3/4 cup butter/margarine
Neither light nor dark
"I was scared, mom." He gives me a big hug and then was on his way, telling his brothers all about the things he saw, telling them he wasn't scared at all.
After posting today’s Money Matters on Identity Theft and discussing social security numbers, WordPress immediately deactivated our blog! Their automatic anti-spam controls believed the blog was trying to not only spam the blogosphere but also phish for people’s information. I say, great job!
She was startled hearing that from her best friend. She looked back at the past, and tried to think that those were all choices, it was all just a crossroad. She faced crossroads all the time.
Me: Arrrgh! Leave me alone! OK ...*flexes fingers* I just need to describe Robert...
Green Gold
Reading: Style and You, gotta love the Sunday supplements.
The square sides are already assembled into the wood frame, so for those pieces I had to get an exact fit and iron it right on. For the rectangular pieces, I ironed it on, the wrapped it around the edges before assembling them into the sides of the box!
Then we proceed to the lower deck and as expected, the place was busier than usual cos its a holiday and many people took this opportunity to do their marketing.
However, Minister Kent is also a pit bull in the cabinet. He has been hand picked because of his knowledge of the media. He can attack when that is needed, as he did when it was deemed necessary to question the integrity of certain environmental activist groups in the Enbridge Northern Gateway debate. When employing his menacing style he can, through fear, stop others from speaking, as he did recently with scientists employed by the government. But his favorite tactic is to threaten those who have very limited means to protect themselves.
What does she think of her younger counterparts? “Bah, in my day we used to learn everything on the job, if you’ll pardon the pun. Hookers today don’t know they’re born, with their MCAST courses and ETC training schemes.”
Brooklyn is always the one in the cowboy boots.
The state’s negligence and complicity have led the entrenchment of major criminal- militant combines and their lesser affiliates. A January 2012 report by journalist Zia-ur-Rehman noted that the enforcement agencies in Karachi had discovered that several previously unknown militant outfits operating in the city were linked to TTP, and these provided access to local level logistics and manpower support to Pakistan’s major domestic terrorism combine. The head of Karachi’s Anti-Extremism Cell (AEC) Chowdhry Aslam, disclosed that one such group, al Mukhtar, basically a splinter cell of TTP’s Badar Mansoor group, was specially deployed in Karachi to collect extortion funds, carry out bank heists and abductions-for-ransom, as well as for terrorist activities and attacks. Sources in CPLC noted that abduction for ransom had become an easiest way to collect large sums of money.
Once that is all melted and incorporated, add your vanilla and reserve 1/3 cup of the chocolate sauce.
No Need to Argue -Cranberries.
I think most of this comes from going to church last night for my recommitment ceremony for being an extraordinary minister of the Eucharist. During my time in church I drew upon my relationship with God and realized that I need to stop holding onto these negative statements as hard facts. The fact of the matter is I’m Jacqui! I try to live a good life. I am an EXCELENT friend and loyal as hell. Even if I have trouble connecting myself with physical beauty I know that I have a good soul and a good heart. I’m done apologizing for myself or what I feel or the things that I do and enjoy. I am done apologizing for being Qui. I am done pacifying others and letting them keep me in a dark place. The only opinion I care about is my own, and if you don’t like it well take a hike because I’m done giving other people power over what I think of myself. I’m dark and stormy sometimes and sometimes I’m bright and shiny. Whatever I am on any given day I know that I am awesome, I know that I have the best of friends, and family members that care and love me and don’t judge for the sake of ripping me down.
One of the loudest plumbing problems is something called a water hammer. Water hammers, or fluid hammers, typically occur when dishwashers, washing machines or toilets suddenly stop the flow of water. When the water is shutoff, there is a loud banging sound.
Maybe I’ve seen enough to say it as it is
To enable your router’s firewall, you need to log into your configurations web page. This adds a layer of defense that can help in securing your wireless network. Thereafter your next step should be installing a third party firewall. Most reputable Anti-Virus programs can be purchased with a firewall so if you spend time online make sure that your anti-virus has one.
have on your feet the gospel of peace, have the helmet of salvation on, and
9. Brain Damage 3:40
Also, this house was empty because the family relocated. We went in with a lower bid and asked them to pay for all the closing costs. We put the offer in on Saturday and figured we would probably hear sometime on Monday morning about the counter. I mean what seller wants to pay ALL the closing costs right?!
I've been stuck on what to do for table numbers up until today. I was honestly procrastinating on the project A LOT. I knew I wanted to incorporate the hearts into the table numbers while having a simple project and simple design that would detract from the centerpieces. I was still contemplating using photo frames (as seems to be popular these days) and putting some heart design on the paper inside. But frames are expensive (I could have had free ones if I got that at the recycling center bu we live too far away now so the cheapest at Michaels were 3.99!) But then at Michaels I found something perfect... on a clearance rack they had small photo clip/ place cards holders! They come in packs of 6 for only 99cents!!! My table numbers are costing a grand total of three dollars paid for by a gift card so technically free! They look like Christmas tree ornaments but not too much that it would looks Christmasy (which is great because we are Jewish and don't celebrate Christmas). I got ones that are silver and black (they also had pink)and the best part yet: they already have linked hearts on the side...just. my. luck!!!!!!!!
We have been given a few examples of birth plans from other families in similar circumstances to go by. One in particular was of great benefit to us. It was provided by a couple we met by chance over the internet. Their beautiful baby girl Alexandria blessed them with 50 days of her sweet life. Despite the newness of their pain and loss, Doug and Kim were very open about talking on the phone with us. They just recently lost their precious baby girl on February 4th of this year to Trisomy 18. It was evident through their tribute video how very much this little girl was loved and cherished every moment of her short life. Of course they are very sad, sometimes overwhelmed with their grief, but they made it very clear to us that they had no regrets about choosing to bring baby Alex into this world. If Nora chooses to migrate to heaven on tiny angel wings, it makes me smile to know she’ll have such a sweet little angel friend waiting to play with her.
These were even more cakes that we carried home one day from near where we live.As ever, they're all made from the lightest sponge which is traditional with Chinese style cakes and I spot a Chocolate, strawberry, Mango, Black Forest and Black Sesame flavours.
(up from €169.2 billion in February).
Laudir De Oliveira - percussion
Vocal with Piano, Bass
I haven't written here in a long time. And as much as I would like to blame that on being too busy with maintaining the business and fatherhood, the truth is that I haven't had anything to say. Linecook had its run and served (and still to some extent, serves) its purpose. I'm proud of it and thankful for everything it has brought me. But the truth is that I look at the person that wrote it and he is not here. I do not recognize him anymore.
Just like my father, my family inspires me to pick up my camera. Beyond the family trips and birthday celebrations, I am captivated by capturing the everyday moments. Those moments that I don’t want to forget: the way my youngest curls her blankie around her fingers before she drifts off to sleep, or the dozens of chocolate chip cookies we’ve baked together over the years; even a simple hand-scrawled note or a family game of cards.
“Less is more.” (Ludwig Mies van der Rohe)
This is probably more of an issue for those who do celebrate Christmas than those who do not, but it definitely can be categorized under Christmas controversies. Many businesses and people will now wish you a happy holidays instead of a Merry Christmas. Some claim that they are taking the Christ out of Christmas. I would advise you not to hop onto this crazy bandwagon. Why should we force those who are not Christians to use Christ’s name? Are they giving any honor to his name? Most certainly not! The truth is, not everyone is a Christian, but we as Christians still ought to interact with those non-believers in a positive manner. Unbelievers are not taking the Christ out of Christmas, it was never there to begin with for them.
The stamps I used are by SP&Company. I love how you can mix and match the words and use different colors of ink so easily to combine the perfect sentiment.
For my surprise all the posts with images side by side changed. The original edition I did was modified.
Bake a bundt for National Bundt Day on November 15th! Then submit a photo or blog post by November 24, 2011 and I'll send you a 1 1/4" button for baking along with me! I'm going to put together a round-up of all the bundts submitted! The submission info can be found here!
I knew the Book Depository would deliver within ten working days, so I went to their site. I bought two PD James paperbacks and CD, for $39. If my Collins bookstore had of have the good sense to stock some of the backlist of a major author, the same books and CD would have cost $80-$100. I wonder if my local bookstore
Sure enough, in my hands, was a flyer brochure offering me the opportunity to get my Masters of Education from Cambridge College's National Institute for Teaching Excellence. Odd, since I lack a Bachelor's of Education. In fact I'm a college dropout. But here I was being offered a Master's of Education.
Do better next time.
Did you have a grand exit from your ceremony or are you planning one?
He didn't know where it was so she asked him to pull over to the kerb and got out.
Up 3rd access, down 1st Saddle with Joe. All running except for the obvious stuff on the way up. Overnight precip precluded any Flattie scrambling, so I put in a solid but fatigued 36:49 effort to the summit. After waiting for Joe on top we descended to Gregory in 17:08 before jogging back over to Chat for a 57:50 roundtrip (obviously not including our time sitting on the summit). My gimpy ankle was cause for some significant caution on the descent, so the roundtrip can definitely go much more quickly with healthy limbs and a sprint back across the Chautauqua meadow.
It has manifested
Anyway, onto the business at hand. So according to Weight Watchers (WW), a woman of my height (which is 5 foot 6 inches) should weigh anywhere from 124 to 155 pounds. Just to meet the high end of that range, I will have to lose 79 pounds. And yes to all of you math geniuses out there I did more or less just inform all of cyberspace what my weight is. Since the conception of this blog, I struggled with whether or not I was going to put it out there. I struggled actually right up until this very second. But I figured since one day I will be featured in the "success story" section of WW Magazine or the "weight loss" issue of People magazine (on stands now by the way), I would have to share it anyway seeing as they literally just put those three numbers out there in black and white (for the rest of us who are inept at math) for the whole world to see.
Since then, I depended on purified water – an additional expense for wage earner like me. But I had to stretch my budget just to have safe water to drink.
At this year’s IBC we will showcase our recent high profile system installations for Doordarshan, M-NET and Al Jazeera and we will have members of our team on hand to discuss your forthcoming projects and needs.
Maybe the Ninety-nine Percenters and the Occupy Movement have some things right within the mix of their unfocused ideas. There are certain issues that some of them espouse that I am in agreement with. There is a disparity of wealth in our society and for some it seems to be getting worse.
We began to ask for the grace to “see” only what the Father was giving us day-to-day instructions to do. I remembered that Jesus in some places healed everyone who came to him; in other places compassion focused His attention. He didn’t heal every sick person in Palestine, but He did do what “he saw the Father doing.” He was responsive to suffering which “crossed His path” as it were: the blind beggar on the side of the road, the father whose son was an epileptic as well as demonized, the dead only son of the widow from Nain
One character Disney didn’t need to cute up too much.
“Oh?”
1 wasting
I've only slept about 10 hours total in the last three days; only two of those hours in the last 24.
Hello Live Oak Fans!
And make sure you go check out SVG ATTIC because they just released some amazing new sets this week and you're gonna love them!! I can't wait to play with this new one!
-”You have to find it by yourself Fatima .When you do ,I’m sure you will come back .”
Monday, February 12th
The lodge is beautiful. Every inch is decorated with amazing, vibrant mosaics.
A little background: My mom's side of the family gets together FOR EVERYTHING; I mean, come on - we are a big Irish/English family, but we celebrate Cinco de Mayo, seriously, the most freckles in one room, eating burritos! So growing up, we saw A LOT of each other.
Thing or person you would like to be in your next life
Combine above ingredients.
Once again, not knowing even approximate ages for many (most, really) makes it difficult to assess the situation. I find it hard to believe that Roger is old enough to have been around at the time of the mass memory loss, ditto for Beck, so it seems unlikely that Beck’s ‘Memory’ is actually from the past. But that calls into question – where the hell did it come from, then? We could question if we really believe Beck about it, too, but there’s nothing to indicate that he is lying, and, anyway, what does he have to gain by lying? After all, last we were aware of, people who admit to having Memories are not safe in Paradigm City.
David Grubbs (guitar player in three of the most important bands of the '80s, Squirrel Bait Bitch Magnet and Bastro) along with bass player Bundy Brown, formed Gastr Del Sol.
An honest mistake really, and over here in Kuala Lumpur, Malaysia, us foodies will drive far out to get some good food. Sometime even across to the next state. Naturally this is nothing less to expect of me even though I'm travelling in a different country. When it comes to good food, I will be all geared up to look up for the best place to satisfy my tummy.
Combine all other ingredients in large bowl.
I covered the photo with a small piece of mica to protect and give it that vintage feel. Oh and the map paper? It was brand-new, but a little ripping and some brown panpastels and viola! Perfectly aged.
and looked her in the eyes
To go with the lightness of the chiffon cake, I filled it and covered it with cream that I whipped up with cocoa powder and sugar. Then I dusted the top with more cocoa powder, and decorated it with some whole coffee beans. Hope you enjoyed it K and C!
"Me to honey, me to! But you've got a fan!"
This is my puttering spot where I like to plant my potted plants. This is a space that's
Part of the problem I think is that when ordering a glass of the wine in a restaurant or bar, it’s often served too cold, masking the flavors and reducing the bright acidity to a flabby, uninteresting wine.
So it’s knuckle down time for my final project – Viveka and Oanh gave us some good tips for writing up the final report that is due alongside the project: remember to consider the assessment criteria that is in the course outline. I’m going to do as recommended and place each assessment criteria as a heading in the final report in order to give my document some structure, then write over the headings (or make more user-friendly headings) in the final draft. Remember to be reflective, and if some parts of the project haven’t manifested, then justify (or explain) why this has happened.
One of my all-time favorite beers gets its name from the 1969 burning of the Cuyahoga River (really it happened: Burning Cuyahoga). The label shows the Cleveland skyline with the burning Cuyahoga River running through it. A nice play on an easy target if you want to make fun of Cleveland.
election promises —
In statement released after an uncomfortably long silence, Burger King said it pulled the ad due to a licensing issue and expected to have it back on air soon. It wouldn't comment on whether the ad would remain the same.
To clear up the mystery a little further, Bailey has a second story on John’s death later on in the collection: “A Military Couple (part two – A Different Perspective). Once again, death is never mentioned, but this time the perspective is from one of the two men who comes to Laura’s door. He admits he hadn’t had a chance to say goodbye to John, whom he calls Johnnie. It turns out that the narrator of part two is the man “she briefly met at a birthday party.” As much as is said about Johns’ death is: “It was terrible, breaking the news.” But once again, death, accident, or anything of the kind is never mentioned at all.
So the answer, in short, "cap" hair nets are for bobbed hair; "fringe" hair nets are for longer hair.
I don't remember this last year--glad to see another Texas Oktoberfest, even if it is likely to taste like Shiner Bock with a twist. It has '96' on the neck label--maybe this is what they brewed that year for their anniversary beer.
So challenge yourself to see what you can put together with just bits and pieces.
Our preferred area in the hotel is the pool area. The pool is gorgeous and it’s always very warm. Right by the pool there is a huge lawn where I usually play soccer with Evan.
In 1897, Arbuckle also went into sugar refining and opened the refinery at 10 Jay Street in DUMBO. (They started the refinery after Havemeyer Sugar in Williamsburg refused to lower their prices for Arbuckle, one of their biggest customers. After Arbuckle went into the sugar business, Havemeyer promptly went into the coffee business, and a protracted commercial war ensued between the two companies, causing depressed prices in coffee and sugar for years.)
You are now on the hunt – track down as many lions, horses, elephants and ducks as you can find.
Wow! what a river! We first crossed the equator again from south to north this time and had another ceremony with King Neptune but minus his queen. The captain was thrown in again plus the officers and then the passengers volunteered to participate which meant kneeling down with your head down for icy cold water to be thrown over it. You then had the opportunity to say your last words (I declared my love for the captain!) you do get silly on this ship but all in good humor and then thrown into the pool to join everybody there. Unfortunately I got terribly sunburnt, not intended but it all took place at noon at 0 degrees latitude on the equator. Blast it, I was so cross with myself. It was called the ceremony of the Blue Nose, though mine was bright red and we had crossed into the sea of the Pollywog. We have a new cruise director and it is entirely up to him, hence the different ceremony. Got the certificate again. so now I have really experienced it all.
Dragging its body into the windless sea
The latter part of the album is just as fulfilling and emotion teasing as the first with songs like the at times surreal and magnetic Messiah Mask, the 70’s rock spiced title track, and the imposing homeric closer Ants leaving one breathless, bedazzled, and urgently eager for more.
I know what you're thinking.. "awwww that's even sweeter." It could have been, but I know him too well. Pretty much what was a surprise for me, turned into him making something for me, which was going to turn into him making what he likes and say it's for me, and I'm going to have to say it's the most wonderful thing in the world. Ever.
Anyway, I feel like I've waffled on enough. How are things with you? I do hope that you're alive and well, and that you are still using this email. I have been in here for a year after all, you might all be floating around in hover-cars out there for all I know! If you are please send me a photo of yours.
Then when I finally got into bed he didn’t say anything but he kept huffing and tossing and turning. I knew something was bothering him – more than his back – but I was exhausted and had a horrible headache and didn’t feel up to dealing with whatever was on his mind that he wanted me to ask about rather than just talking to me.
You have time until 22 april 23:59.
Protestants, of course, could be no less zealous than papists in their diatribes against women who presumed to interfere in men’s business—particularly when women who threatened to bring Catholicism back to the throne were on the horizon. Actually, the Protestants could be even more vehement, as they had a religious doctrine within which the Father, whether God, King, or husband, was the model of all authority. Depending on which side you stood—Catholic or Protestant—determined which presumptuous women were most offensive to you. When Mary Tudor became queen of England in 1553, her Catholicism added fuel to the fire that was already burning in Protestant reformer John Knox, who argued, in his famously titled The First Blast of Trumpet Against the Monstrous Regiment of Women, “that any woman who presumed ‘to sit in the seat of God, that is, to teach, to judge, or to reign above a man’” was “a monster in nature.”[7] And then the old familiar charges came pouring out again: “Nature…doth paint them forth to be weak, frail, impatient, feeble, and foolish, and experience hath declared them to be unconstant, variable, cruel, and lacking the spirit of counsel and regiment.”[8] No wonder that Elizabeth felt it important that people see her as having “the heart and stomach of a King”![9]
I leave for Sabrina's house in about three hours and I really, really should be packing for Dragon*con instead of doing this... but I gotta write down everything I can about the conference before it all gets pushed out of my head by my next trip! This will be long, because honestly, almost everything that happened at the conference was a highlight for me.
Thanks in advance for taking a look at this amazing company....it's all good!!
5. Last restaurant you ate at?
“There are a lot of things that work very, very well but my main concern is that there is friction between the authority of the referee and justice in football.
After the sun the rain,
Gehry said he would, "as soon as the guys let me," adding "talk to Stuckey"--a reference to Forest City Ratner VP Jim Stuckey.
Get new haircut & color. Went brunette. Went back blonde a week later. This year, I will go with a new hair cut...but that's about it.
So within a week of repotting, I definitely see new leaves growing!
Instead, head out to the mall and buy her an all expense paid shopping spree to her favorite shoe store. Or put her on a plane to a beach somewhere. Or give her a lifetime of body massages at the Holistic Health Clinic where Mai, the masseuse will be happy to walk all over her back.
1. Unforgivenenss comes when we believe that our future has been taken from us or irreparably damaged.
Well four weeks in, and I’m still going strong. I have to admit that I wasn’t sure how I was going to handle this training on my own, without the support or structure of a running group. I think I have been very committed and dedicated to the training, and blogging about it each week helps to keep me focused and on track, so my apologies if things start to sound a bit repetitive.
In 2011, Thurman was a member of the jury for the main competition at the Cannes Film Festival. In December 2011, James Hibberd of Entertainment Weekly reported Thurman had joined the cast of NBC’s Smash as Rebecca Duvall. Thurman will appear in five episodes of the drama series.
The paper then goes on to talk about tidal heating and Io’s heat output. It first mentions the (accurate) prediction in 1979 (in the above referenced paper) that Io could be “the most intensely heated terrestrial-type body in the solar system ” due to tidal heating. They go on to say:
Paper: real red, certainly celery, chocolate chip (SU), heavenly white (PaperTemptress), designer paper (PTI)
A couple dollars later (ok, it was a bit more than just a couple of dollars), we were packing it all into the back of the van and heading home.
Just one more little tip.... All during the festivities many of our design teams and challenge team members will be giving away some fantastic blog candy to a blessed commenter on their blog. You won't know ahead who has the candy... but if you visit the blogs of the team members who participated in that day's challenge, you might also win their candy!!! How sweet a deal is that? The links will be given right in the blog post for that day along with their creations for the challenge... but if you visit them and leave a comment... you might win their candy too!!!
This book was simply made of win. It's amazeballs to see the characters from the ID start to relate to the MI series. If you love the Mortal Instruments but aren't sure about starting this series, do it. I promise you, you won't regret it. My excessive capitalized words should indicate just how mind-blowing this book is!
So tonight, I will watch ABC’s offering of “Once Upon a Time” and see how I like it. Not sure if I would let little kiddies watch though, so make sure you tell them a good bedtime fairy tale when you tuck them in, and then settle down for your adult version. Let me know how you like it!
Eating right is very important in a 100-miler. Here's an explanation of why:
You’ll make new friends
"Riparian buffers function as water filters. When it rains, buffers trap pollutants and eroded soil before they get into the creek. While keeping the creek water clean, buffers provide food, shelter and shade for fish, frogs, birds and small animals. They also stabilize creek banks, which helps prevent soil erosion. Environment Canada's Habitat Guidelines recommend a 30-metre buffer along cold water creeks and a 15 - metre buffer along warm water creeks for these ecological features to perform their function. There are many creeks in our watersheds that do not meet these standards.
Hope this random fact makes your day a little sweeter! See you all tomorrow with my Friday's Fancies!
This is the time of year when we start talking about seeds and butterflies and frogs, and the circles of life associated with them. Seed, sprout, leaves, grow-grow-grow, flowers, fruit, seed, sprout, leaves, grow-grow-grow, flowers, fruit, seed, sprout . . .
And now it's time to let it through
Well, I’m going to suggest that it could. And I don’t think this is very controversial, either. If you’re going to disagree at this stage, and argue that nobody possessing the wherewithal not to drool all over themselves could ever possibly be fooled by some sort of trick, and persuaded that a bent spoon hadn’t simply been bent by physical force alone… well, good luck with that in a world where people who still think wrestling is real manage to get dressed in the mornings without help. People are always getting taken in by fake stuff, even intelligent people. If you’re a trusting person, and inclined to believe in psychic powers already, then it doesn’t seem implausible that someone might, in theory, be able to trick you.
and when a space opens up, I go back to my list.
1. Give me the chance to say “YES”
'Q' is a total riot...a homage to B-movies of the 50's like 'The Beast from 20,000 Fathoms' and 'King Kong' (1933).
Yes Easter is about family as well, and on days like today I miss having my family around. But it also means I have a bigger family, and it doesn’t matter where I celebrate, in which language or tradition, we are celebrating as a family the greatest day. So today I will celebrate with ‘family’, the death and resurrection of our Saviour, the amazing love and the great hope.
Enjoyment/Summary
I didn't use a pattern for this dress, just two sheets of computer paper taped together. Real classy folks! I based it on the pattern found here and then tweaked the sizing and sleeves. To get started, here's what you'll need:
Verbal art is a complex subject and as with a lot of things we are discussing my goal is just to give you a foundation in order for you to explore the idea more and develop it in to your own skill set. Communication is not just done with words it involves hand gestures, facial expressions, body positioning as well as many other factors. In order to be effective with your verbal art you have to learn to observe every aspect of the situation and the buyer to be able to take advantage of everything you see.
- 2nd: Played games at my aunt Shaneen's house with the family. -
The lawsuit alleges that the state’s voter photo ID law violates the Pennsylvania Constitution by depriving citizens of their most fundamental constitutional right – the right to vote. The plaintiffs are asking the Commonwealth Court to issue an injunction blocking enforcement of the law before November’s election. If the law is not overturned, most of the plaintiffs will be unable to cast ballots in the fall, despite the fact that many of them have voted regularly for decades.
The lichen that carpets the floor of the Lapland forests is plush and pliant, moist and springy to the touch. It blooms in jade-toned terrestrial clouds, swallowing our footsteps and muting our voices.
James is another example of a decent and hard working American who needs two jobs just to make ends meet. He may be too busy to travel but he is sacrificing what little free time he has to make a difference.
I woke up around 2 a.m. to pee and I noticed that I was having light, but REAL contractions. They were different from the cramps, twinges and pressure I’d been feeling over the previous week (my body had definitely been giving me the signals that it was gearing up for labor). I just knew it wouldn’t be long before we’d meet our
When the Nineteenth Amendment was passed in 1920, many women had been voting for quite a while. Fifteen states had given women full suffrage and others had received the right to vote in various types of elections. One hundred years ago, in 1912, the women of Oregon won the right to vote. In honor of this event, the Oregon Women’s History Consortium has been formed to “lead the centennial celebration of woman suffrage and to promote women’s history beyond 2012.” At their website you can find information about the long fight in Oregon, the women who spear-headed that fight, documents, and current news and events.
Who chatters with teeth ripped from a face of beauty
“Get going!” Henderson snapped without hesitation. “You want to die stupidly?”
“(NaturalNews) Northwestern University scientists have pulled together a review of research into what music — specifically, learning to play music — does to humans. The result shows music training does far more than allow us to entertain ourselves and others by playing an instrument or singing. Instead, it actually changes our brains.
This scene has played out in my life quite often I’m afraid, and unfortunately I feel that I can no longer in good conscience let the topic slide by without stating my opinion. You see, I do not think that there has ever been a golden era of world history or American history since that accursed day in Eden. Is this just my opinion or is there some biblical backing to my belief? We’ll see in a minute, but for now back to Woody Allen.
Two networks have just announced a new drama for the upcoming season and they both will be starring a member from the popular group Arashi. One of the networks is Fuji TV, who finally lifted the secret about their next Monday drama. It’s title is going to be ‘Kagi no Kakatta Heya‘ and will star Ohno Satoshi as the protagonist.
Jacksonville, I believe — I spent a night in my old
But it seems to me it's rather expensive if it's only going to last around 2.5 years. So if I'm going to replace it, then what with?
She’ll fleece you while your sleeping
This is now. But then! Then, being 1884, Paris France. John Singer Sargent, reknowned portrait painter, submitted a finished portrait of a young Paris society matron - Madame Pierre Gautreau. Admired and adored by Paris society as one of the young social hostesses with impeccable taste in all she wore or did, Madame happily agreed to sit for the famous artist. During the next several years many sittings took place. Sargent was a guest of the Gautreau family, with many opportunities to sketch Madame in preparation for the offical portrait.
4) “If Mark Zuckerberg create the online social networking website then Sean Parker implies to growing up the Facebook.”
Not everyone will go for an album like this, and I suspect it will be too stylised and devoid of ‘singalong value’ for some. But it’s full of great musicianship, and for Jools Holland purists, it’s pretty much unmissable.
He spoke fluently with conviction and also some humour, he took a dig at UKIP for not having its education policy on the first page of its policy document –especially as he agreed with so much of it. Without doubt his speech was the most moving of the day.
i have not forgotten you. how could i forget you?
Lunch was PBnJ, mini carrots and grape tomatoes with humus, and apple slices.
You can find the links here....
Let that sink in a little bit….
Once again, the beneficial owners of this company were not named.
What does a veteran look like? They are fathers, husbands, brothers, sons, and friends. They are mothers, wives, sisters, daughters, and friends. They come in all shapes and sizes, but they have one thing in common. A desire to serve our country and protect our freedoms.
Could last semesters Animal Science 621 class please meet in Mrs. Gallant’s room at first break.
toward those isles of yours that wait for me.
The fly assassin. We had a fly invading our kitchen and as anyone studying for their ServSafe certification can tell you flies can transfer Shigellosis to food which can cause bloody diarrhea. (bet you'll never look at food at a picnic the same again). A ligtle kindergartener to my boss to just call our custodian because he can do anything. Aweee....so cute!
But back to that American Pale Ale. Beer lovers know that the "American" in American Pale Ale refers to the style of pale ale -- in this case, a bitter type pale ale. I brought a few over to a poker game the other night and got some interesting reactions from the international crowd. But indeed it was the Americans who assumed American meant "watery" in this case. They seemed to think a Japanese brewer was trying to reproduce that ever-so-American Budweiser sensibility.
'Birth of Venus' by Botticelli
The proposal in the draft treaty that Ireland, again like every other member state, would lose its designated member on a smaller EU Commission, (one of the unique European institutions) for five years out of fifteen, excited particular opposition and became almost totemic. Other issues causing disquiet included fears that Ireland might have to give up its favourable low rate of company taxation, which had brought much inward investment, and that its military neutrality might be compromised.
This song always made me think a lot about love. It was, after all 1971, I was 15 years old and the talk of love was everywhere. I was so curious. It seemed everybody else knew what love was like, everyone except me. There it was on TV, for god’s sake. Even advertising talked about it, I wasn’t sure if I would ever experience love, after all, who was going to love someone like me? My mother told me, I’d have a difficult time finding anybody to love me.
What caught my attention the most was the $42 million revenue the company, Rovio, has had from the game. I knew that to become a smartphone ap you make a ton of money, but I had no idea that it was so much! It’s really intriguing that such a simple idea and simple game could become so popular among all age groups. Weirdly enough, I know some of my parents friends that play the game as well. I don’t know how to feel about that as a frequent player of the game myself, but what I do know is that shows how successful this game is if it can reach such a large audience.
Psalm 100 (ESV) says:
Well, I tried to finish 4 layouts today but I only got 2 of them done. But they are cute!
Charlatans Can’t get out of bed UK Charlatans Nobody UK
It gets worse. Like, when you try on clothes, do YOU throw them all in a ball on the dressing room floor for the poor sucker who works there to pick up? No, of course you doon't. I mean, didn't yo' mama teach you better? Do you treat your stuff like that? Or more to the point, do you treat other people's stuff like that? No! ;You ahve manners! I swear, if I have to pick up ONE MORE balled up pair of pants or inside out sweater from the floor, I'm gonna lose it.
This back bedroom received its first guest last week end...
A few weeks ago, the NY Times published an article titled “The Good Ol’ Days of 20 Years Ago,” about nostalgia for the 1990s, particularly Nickelodeon, among young adults. I think I’ve said before that I’m planning to do a book on nostalgia and theology at some point in the near future. My thoughts on nostalgia are not fully formed yet, but a few things are worth pointing out in this article.
But even as I brushed this comment underneath my proverbial carpet, it must have been churning around somewhere in the depths of my mind before working itself into my spirit because I suddenly began to let this thought slowly see daylight again, it wasn’t until I re-blogged the following post that I sat down and examined what the Holy Spirit was saying to me.
Time Magazine then weighed in with this article in their March 29, 1948 issue, basically regurgitating various ideas from Wertham's symposium.
So, Saturday morning dawned and myself and a very quiet B climbed into a taxi and trundled off to band practice. When we got there one of my daughter’s friends came over and told B where the Clarinetists sit she also introduced us to the band teacher, who was very welcoming. The format was very relaxed and parents were able to stay in the hall to listen. As I sat down anther parent I knew came over to chat. Her daughter is a year older than B and also plays the Clarinet. Good, I thought, another person he knows.
1 beget
I have a confession: I initially bought this wine for the label. I have read about the psychology behind choosing a certain image or color to evoke a feeling in the consumer. The label is supposed to evoke a “lifestyle” for the consumer and I guess The Other Guys that make Leese-Fitch succeeded . . . at least with me.
First, I ignored one of the basics of design, and put the focal point of my painting (the ship) in the exact center of the page. The eye is more likely to interpret an object in this position as coming toward it.
In the breaststroke, the swimmer leans on the chest, arms breaking the surface of the water slightly, legs always underwater and the head underwater for the second half of the stroke. The kick is sometimes referred to as a “frog kick” because of the resemblance to the movement of a frog’s hind legs; however, when done correctly it is more of a “whip kick” due to the whip-like motion that moves starting at the core down through the legs.
all on their own in the 25th century
We should vote all of them out of office and clean up their mess!
Soon after he was elected, disaster struck the local area in 1869 when the Royal Dockyard at Woolwich was shut. With silting affecting the riverside and technological advances at other docks such as Chatham, the closure became inevitable and this meant large lay offs of the local population, which to make matters worse also coincided with lay offs at the Royal Arsenal. This was not good news for the sitting MP who was also the Prime Minister. By 1874 Greenwich was not regarded as a safe seat and there was some consternation when, in 1873, Gladstone assumed the Chancellorship as well as already being Prime Minister, as it was the law that an MP was required to submit to a by-election on accepting a ministerial post. The government decided that as Gladstone was already a minister and this was, effectively, a second post, a by-election was not necessary. However the government were nervous as this lay them open to a legal challenge on this point.
Next up for The Citadel: two more home SoCon games, against Elon and UNC-Greensboro. Elon has been a mild surprise this season, playing about as well as any team in the muddled SoCon North. The Phoenix won at home over South Carolina earlier in the campaign, but recently has hit a slump, losing five straight games.
In Aleppo, Syria’s largest city, gunmen opened fire on two army colonels in the central Bab al-Hadid roundabout, killing them.
At the same time the government and media pump out endless multi-cultural propaganda against 'racism' or 'islamphobia', it appears to demand silence when our children are the victims of organised campaigns of rape.
They DO have a tow-line that will tow you back up the hill on your tube, but the line of people waiting to get on the tow line was pretty long. So the first 4 times, we just walked back up the hill. (See the people on the right side of the picture above walking up alongside the tow line). THAT was quite a workout. ESPECIALLY the two times my youngest son's hand slipped, he let go of his tube, and it went flying back down to the bottom of the hill. So I actually got to climb the hill 6 times after walking back down to get his tube and bring it back up.
Many of the speakers do an excellent job and are fascinating. I’ll admit that most are a bit out of my league or just don’t pique my interest. However, I ran across one of their videos that surprised me. You can go to TED.com or YouTube and search for “Terry Moore: How to tie your shoes”.
Some idea of Cameron’s deep-seated hatred of truth tellers is evident in remarks he made about Griffin at a recent Conservative Party conference. Cameron referred to Nick Griffin MEP as ‘a ghastly piece of filth’. This is an appalling way to speak about an elected official. Moreover, it is highly inflammatory. It is the sort of language that will be heard by some Islamic fanatics who will interpret these cowardly and intemperate remarks as tacit incitement to murder Nick Griffin. I expect such remarks from aliens such as Trevor Phillips, Bhikhu Parekh and Dianne Abbot. However, I do not expect, nor do I wish to hear such language from the leader of the opposition and a potential prime minister of Britain. Nick Griffin has a wife and children. I hope Cameron’s words never come back to haunt him. Cameron would do well to offer Nick Griffin an unreserved and public apology.
Since the aircraft resumed flying operations in September, the F-22 has flown more than 12,000 sorties and returned to operational capability.
What is interesting about the show it that it is fairly apolitical – you never know what party the administration represents. One of the reasons I stopped watching the West Wing was I thought the show was getting a little too preachy in its politics week in and week out. That doesn’t appear to be an issue with Veep. While there are some references to issues, they are mostly secondary and fairly benign. There has also been some speculation before the pilot aired that this show was somehow based on Sarah Palin. That is not the case. People were apparently making that assumption based solely on the fact that the show features a female vice president.
After Blavatski, Annie Besant became the leader of theosophy. She was head of the British sec-tor of the mixed (male and female) Masonic Order “Le Droit Humain” and after her came Alice Baily, who set out to create a particular theosophical group, the “Arcane School” (1923). She created and advanced the familiar modern day “New Age” movement, which has an intense messianic and anti-Christian character. The influence of theosophy on the mystic Masonic religion is evident, the most important characteristic of which is Masonry’s adoption of the theosophic teaching of a future, final “World Teacher.” Based on many writings of Blavatski, the praiser of the Satan-serpent, as much as on the title of one of her magazines “Lucifer,” it evident that the term “theosophy” is derived in truth from the term “θεος-οφις” (Theos-ofis =god-serpent) and not from “θεου-σοφια” (Theou-sophia = Wisdom of God).
His tongue sticks out while he sleeps.
Ruth E. Stuettgen has a keen interest in Magnetic Entrepreneurial Skills including Business Empowerment, Magnetic Empowerment Skills, Magnetic Time Management Techniques, Magnetic Selling and Marketing Skills and more. These are invaluable to small business owners and solopreneurs as well as other businesses. In this blog, and her Focus on Balance website, she offers valuable tips and insights into developing various business entrepreneurial and managerial skills that help achieve success.
So, since I have not tatted for a while I will post my knitting stuff. But I have been working the shuttle trying to get some gifts done for Christmas and realized that I really am a bit rusty.
Another very wet day, so glad I didn't have to go out. I've enjoyed another day of scrapping, but at least I got dressed this time.
I’m still in the process of honing my list of 2011 goals, dreams, and resolutions, but I have come up with a workout schedule that I believe I can stick with. Last year didn’t really go so well in the weight loss department, and I came to a conclusion. I was acting like a rabbit when really I’m a turtle. I would go fast and furious in great spurts, then I would look at how much I had accomplished and take a nice loooonnnng nap under a tree. After all, I DESERVED it, after all my hard work. The problem was that my naps and the snacks under the tree outweighed the spurts of activity, as evidenced by my weight loss goals not being met for 2010.
"Um, yeah just to inform you. Your judgment has been put under review by the FCAA (Film Critics Association of America). Please submit form 437b along with two essays on (1) the state of American cinema post 1977 and (2) the future of movie making. The board will be in contact with you to schedule a formal hearing after an oversight comittee has had an opportunity to review your submission."
In the end, despite all of the blunders while making the cake, I still loved the end result. Of course the layers didn't look as clean as I would have liked, but seeing Hello Kitty light up and sparkle through silver dragees brought a smile to my face.
Anger is a strange thing. I’ll think I have the damn thing licked, then, months later, it’ll come back with a vengeance. In that way I suppose it’s like herpes. Not that I’d know anything about that.
She carefully gathered up and packed all the tools and equipment needed for the excursion. Each piece of equipment had its own special place in her kit.
Regardless of who they support, those that act in that way are the inner enemy.
(I realize the subject of this song happens to be a girl but, oh, Juanes, you totally understand me! If you don't understand Spanish: trust me, this song fits perfectly with what I'm feeling.)
As part of Songsmith, SAFE will be hosting The TLC Raffle (Travel, Love and Comfort). Three themed packages, each valued at close to or over $1000, will be up for grabs! You do not have to be present to win and raffle tickets are available at SAFE’s Attic and Attic Interiors stores.
We are just in love with her and we just can't seem to get enough!! We have a hard time sharing miss Kendall at the Seamons house:)
Lots and lots of changes ahead.
Well for the exhibition I want him to help me out a bit, since I can’t be there all the time. Thus he had to step out of the book into our 3D world. I want him to hold some postcards for people to take, so he needed to be able to pose and I would whisk him into life. To do this I gathered everything needed. Fleece, fur, wool, wire, scissors, cotton and a free weekend.
CENTERS FOR DISEASE CONTROL AND PREVENTION (CDC). Prevention and control of influenza: recommendations of the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices (ACIP). MMWR Morb Mortal Wkly Rep 2000; 49 (RR-3): 1-38.
We walk up to the host, and tell him a table for two.
Hello and welcome to Day XXX of our November Rubber Die Release Showcase!
OK? I’ve gotta go.
‘Who? Well, Amy’s gone as well.’
them... two of them don't even have an ISBN number. If the amazon sales go well, I may reprint the covers so I can get them listed too.
I told her, in no uncertain terms, that she would not be welcome. I am not some political trophy - I know that she just wants to shoot me, so she can have a another photo of a world leader on her wall - as if I was endorsing the rather strange lady.
The army’s show of solidarity with the Pesident was a heavy blow to protesters who called on the military to take action to push Mubarak out after he announced Thursday night that he would hand most of his powers to Vice President Omar Suleiman but remain in office.
Thirdly, I learned about how the gospel is transformative. I believe that, in my more cynical moments, I give in to what seems like the hard truth, and that is: “People don’t change.” I hear people talk about character and personal piety, and I realize how masterful I am at falling short of the mark. I am masterful at failure. I fail well. And it is hard to believe that people really do change.
At the time, I was very young - I could report what I saw, but I couldn’t tell you what something meant. Coming to live in the so-called First World allowed me to see my world from different eyes. I can’t say I am wiser – but certainly, it was easier to see the stark contrasts between a developing country like the Philippines and comfortable, cozy England.
In this season where I should still and recall all that He has given to me, all that He gave for me, the counting is all the more important.
Something that struck me when I was writing those initial posts in June was that there didn't appear to be any interviews with Price available online, or indeed readily available in print. I managed to find one quote from him in my copy of Donald McCormick and Katy Fletcher's Spy Fiction: A Connoisseur's Guide, but that was it. I knew that, unlike a lot of the authors I blog about, Price was still with us, and I also knew from the number of hits my posts on him were getting that there was still a lot of interest in his work. So, I decided to do something about it.
See what I mean, when I say I am in deep poo-poo?
(Another knock.)
So if you think you’ve got what it takes…think you have the guts to venture your brand towards an ambush marketing campaign?
She opened her eyes frozen in place, fixed on Jacks, and refusing to look any further right. “I see her too but don’t you worry she’s alright by me. What’s your name?”
NORFORK: The ‘Fork has been offering up some good am wading. Take plenty of midges, red/silver Zebra’s Tungsten Rainbow Warriors and Purple Holo Midges.
Instead, I stretch, yawn and roll over. How about you?
The story about Elizabeth Warren claiming to be a Native American minority brings to mind the Andrew Bolt court case in Australia last year. Mr Bolt, who runs a very successful Conservative blog was taken to court by nine 'Aboriginals' for breaching the Racial Discrimination Act by publishing two columns that questioned the new trend by light-skinned people to identify themselves as Aboriginal. Here is a composite of the nine who took Mr Bolt to court:
I’m a little torn over The Avo-Cobb-O Salad that we had. The salad was pretty tasty but with a name like “Avo-Cobb-O”, I really expected there to be more actual avocado in the salad instead of the sparse few slices this dish contained. Plus, I’m not sure why they even bothered to mention the black forest ham in the description because there were only a few thinly sliced slivers on the salad. The honey-mustard dressing served on the side went well with the rest of the salad and there was plenty of chicken, olives and tomatoes. While I don’t mind a little blue cheese, it seemed like there were really big chunks of blue cheese that overwhelmed the rest of the salad.
What's this to do with Land Rovers?
Come hear the readings and stop by the NEHW table where there will be plenty of other books available to buy from these authors in addition to the ones mentioned above.
Amongst the haul of tools I recently purchased was a small and curious hammer. Quite old, it has an interesting shape with an octagonal section, one slightly rounded face and a cross pein. Both peins have a lot of reach. I’ve never seen one like it but it looks like it might be a very useful tool. Currently sans handle, I thought I’d have a bit of a google and see if I can find one.
Here is the video, please be kind...it's my first time doing a video, I was really nervous ;)
3. What was your reaction to Kelsier’s response to finding Marsh dead? I can’t help feeling that there are going to be some serious economic repercussions to destroying the crystals – what sort of impact do you think this will have, not just on the nobles but on the Skaa?
Oh and I had the most fabutastic massage yesterday. Guess what my fave bit was? (It was an all over body massage)
I'm feeling a little discombobulated cos I don't feel like stitching at the moment. I get this way after finishing something. Last night after dinner, I sat on the couch and played games on the iPad all night. :S
To enter, comment on this post (click previous link and scroll) and include an email address (formatted like: cynthia at cynthialeitichsmith dot com) or a link to an email address. Or you can email Cynthia directly with "Joanne Rocklin critique" in the subject line. Author sponsored. Eligibility: U.S./Canada. Deadline: 11:59 CST May 14. Note: please indicate if you're entering for a critique/book or both.
Pelargonium
“So, you are saying that I always say always, and can never pass up the opportunity to say never?” I asked.
As President Obama declared yesterday: "Ovarian cancer continues to have one of the highest mortality rates of any cancer, and it is a leading cause of cancer deaths among women in the United States. This month, we remember the mothers, sisters, and daughters we have lost to ovarian cancer, and we extend our support to those living with this disease. We also reaffirm our commitment to raising awareness about ovarian cancer, and to advancing our screening and treatment capabilities for the thousands of American women who will be diagnosed this year."
We ended up reviewing the Hamlet text they received, and I admonished them not to simply read the synopsis of each scene at the end of each scene. And not to watch any version on film until later. Shakespeare's about the language, people. Read it and weep. In a good way.
FORD - Found On Road Dead
Koh Sin Yee is a 35-year-old Malaysian living in London. Sin Yee is working on a PhD in Human Geography at the London School of Economics and talking to professional Malaysians working in London and Singapore, as well as Malaysians who have moved home.
Rookie cards
I, personally, am sooo tired of being inside all of the time! I even took BOTH kids all by myself to the mall! Now that's desperate ;) haha! So, Landon's way to beat the heat? He takes off all of his clothes, puts on a swim suit, and runs like a crazy man through the sprinklers! Hey, whatever works, right? At least he looks good doing it!
*This dish freezes well. Once the stew has cooled, you can place it in the fridge to solidify the fat. Skim off the fat, transfer into storage containers, and freeze until later use. The texture of the egg whites will change once frozen, but not in a bad way. It tends to get layer-y, but still totally delicious.
This Thanksgiving will be bittersweet. This year, three people who are important to members of my family won't be here. The boys will not see their biological father. They have not mentioned anything about it, but it has been on my mind. Even though the two of us have had a tumultuous relationship over the past few years, he was still their father. Mike's father won't be here to play the role of patriarch at the family Thanksgiving, always the consummate host. There will be a huge hole in the celebration. And finally, my sweet Muz is celebrating with Jesus and making sure that the Thanksgiving table in Heaven is set "just so"... But she won't be with us, and I know my mother will be so affected.
I’ll be there for You
'we are forever seeking the light'
J-BW Billy Williams-$5
When I get overwhelmed, I need to remember not to carry it all.
1HIV is about Hal's redemption. The king, at one point, reveals to Hal that he has so little confidence in him, is so suspicious of him because of his behavior, that he fears Hal will confederate with the king's enemies and help overthrow his own father:
Through a series of agreements that were published in the Diario Oficial de la Federación (DOF), each of these offices defined that the use of force will have to be the last recourse and that it will be applied in observance of five fundamental principles: strict necessity, opportunity, proportionality, rationality, and legality.
The Bluebells - Come Along
My, my, my. If supporting the building of the mosque is the right thing to do, why not stand by those words that were said 13 months ago? Oh wait, that high-moral-ground stand might cost Democrats a seat in Congress. So what liberals are saying is that they are willing to stand up for unpopular causes — unless doing what they say is right may cost them a few votes.
08. Waiting for my chance to come 2:56
The Target toy clearance sale came a day earlier than I expected. Thanks to The Coupon Goddess I found out about the sale. I made some quick schedule changes and ran to Target right after work. I only had 30 minutes to shop. It's amazing what you can accomplish in 30 minutes! I was in such a rush, I forgot to get a picture of my carriage before I went to the register. I guess I did pretty well. I overheard a little boy say to his mom "Wow! that's a LOT of toys!"
Not at all concerned about her frail health, her age factor, or traveling alone or any such issue she went on to live her dream and came back beaming with excitement and fond memories of the two countries she visited Turkey and Greece.
went to a very interesting reading on Saturday evening, given by members of The Author's Mouth group here in Auckland. There'll be another on the last Friday of May, at Borders in Albany's Westfield Mall. In future I will not down two coffees immediately prior to meeting people or wear skinny jeans to drink said coffee and sit for a long period of time.
…”The bottom line is we don’t want to be known as the porn capital of the world,” said Mayor Bob Huber, who is one of those pushing for a measure similar to one the L.A. City Council approved in January…Under its proposed law, the city would require producers to hire on-set medical professionals, who would attest to appropriate condom use. At the end of a shoot, the producers would have to send their unedited video to the police department, where employees would scrutinize it…The city’s preemptive strike is pointless, said Diane Duke, executive director of the Free Speech Coalition…”Very little filming is done in Simi Valley, and I doubt that the production studios are planning any increase at all in the area…However, I am amused at the thought of Simi Valley hiring people to sit around and view porn on taxpayer dollars. I wonder what the training for that would look like.”
wearing coronas Mama has made.
The thing about Brussels is that in true Belgian fashion of individualism, people built what THEY wanted. And whatever was in their best interests. So to be able to appreciate the grandeur is hard - there are no rows of beauty like the circus in Bath, or the rows of stunning architecture in London.
I'm Wendy Janson - It's All About Stamping, your hostess for this challenge. This is the weekend I typically like to put up my Christmas tree and decorations. So this week's challenge is to make a project with a Christmas tree (or pine tree if you would rather) on it. Take a look at what our talented designers came up with:
Meditate and imagine you being in this picture, what message does it send to you?
About five hours after I wrote that last post I went into labor. I woke up with mild and erratic contractions a little after midnight on Saturday, August 13th but within three hours they were coming every five minutes so we decided to head over to the hospital fully expecting that they would dissipate like they always have.
The screen star recently completed a nationwide sold-out comedy tour and a comedy pilot for the CBS network.
I’d love to know your thoughts, though. Is there a certain number, or ceiling that humans will hit in social media? Is Dunbar’s number and it’s theory relevant?
Last week’s Singapore Open mixed doubles champions, Tantowi Ahmad / Liliyana Natsir (pictured), will be looking to grab their fourth title in a row, an impressive string that has seen then move into the number two spot in the world rankings as of this week. The Indonesians advanced to the final after winning a tough match against Thomas Laybourn / Kamilla Rytter Juhl, 21-15, 12-14. To win the fourth one, though, they will again need to prove themselves against the current world number ones, Zhang Nan and Zhao Yunlei. The latter defeated Chen Hung Ling / Cheng Wen Hsing of Chinese Taipei 21-17, 21-17.
76 The Bell Jar – Sylvia Plath
KG What song do you feel best describes your style and why?
Artists like Peter Gabriel and Dave Matthews and R.E.M. use words in the service of art all the time.
2. I turned 40 on Feb 13
This would be a perfect day-to-night cocktail dress, just slip the cardigan off and add tons of bangles (not shown here, I’m still working on my collection!) – perhaps a necklace - and you’ll be ready to hit the town in no time.
How long might Atlantic Yards be stalled? In the New York Times's coverage Friday of the Atlantic Yards stall, developer Bruce Ratner would "not specify the kinds of delays possible, but suggested that construction could be put off for years."
became widely popular to the determent of future generations due to lead
That is what I added to my TBR stack. What did you get this week?
She is pre-med.
09.Resurgence Beneath The Sundown (04:12)
My score:
Katie b.
The other day, my seven year old asked me what was the worst thing that ever happened to me in my life? How could I possibly choose, I thought? Molestation, incest, rape, abuse, alcoholism, prison… I gave him a believable answer, and he told me that the worst thing that ever happened to him was when his Dad wouldn’t let his sister take him to Funtown, but took him himself. I know full well when the worst part of my life was, it was a year midway through my 5 year relapse. It was the year where the woman I do not want to look at was alive, and well, and fully running my life. She was finally out in the open, so to speak, and it made her mad, and uncomfortable beyond words, so her actions spoke the most loudly. She was trying to kill the pain, and her and I in the process. That she did not is yet another miracle.
Whitethroats, grasshopper warblers and willow warblers are now much more the order of the day, along with the occasional short-eared owl hunting for voles and mice. Of course as we are now re-introducing both grazing and scrub removal on the site, we will see a gradual change in the structure and composition of the grasslands. We will ensure that a balance of habitat is maintained, but of course there will be winners and losers, for both the birds, plants and invertebrates. The key will be keeping an eye on changes and being flexible in our management – and of course not trying to do things too quickly. The grasslands as they are now have taken 10-20 years to change from what was once well grazed pasture, and over that time the wildlife gradually changed with it. Perhaps we are looking at a similar length of time to move things back in the other direction while allowing the wildlife a chance to adapt with us. As conservationists we often want to make things happen immediately – but good things can happen to those who wait!
The fine print:
Unlike popular expectations though, the whole of India is not uniformly hot. The North of India actually has seasons, and can get incredibly hot and cold. The climate in the South is more tropical, and the temperature usually fluctuates between a balmy 25 - 35 C, with intense monsoons between June and September. The rains are actually a blessing, as the heat would have been unbearable during this season otherwise. We like to joke that there are three seasons in the South, hot, hotter and hottest, and each vying to make you the most uncomfortable. A lot of people don't realise that its not the heat that gets you, though, its the humidity. That wet towel feeling, to be precise.
I've been using Distress Crackle for years, but I still learned a couple of important tips from this video. Plus, it's always fun to watch Tim create.
So how can we attract a healthy chunk of the good fortune that floats through the atmosphere? Listen to Machiavelli and Professor Wiseman, Paul Allen and Bill Gates. Once you know in your gut that your product, service or idea has good potential to find a client base, trust your instincts and vigorously pursue and promote what you’ve got. Work hard and be ready when the good fortune rolls around, as Machiavelli advised his patron Lorenzo de’Medici. Most of all, take off the blinders and see the gold nuggets that may lie within your reach, as Wiseman’s study demonstrated. Maybe look for a four-leaf clover and have some soda bread too, just for good measure.
One of the students I tutor recently had an assignment from his English teacher to make up a new disease, then write an essay explaining the cause, symptoms, and treatment. I find it insightful and unfortunately not too far from reality. It needs no further introduction, so here it is, published with his permission:
Gayle Bull invites HSA members to The Cradle of American Haiku 3, a haiku festival in Mineral Point, WI, Friday, July 20 through Sunday, July 22. The Cradle Festivals celebrate the importance of the Midwest in the development of English language Haiku. The first Cradle Festival honored Raymond Roseliep of Dubuque, IA, one of the best early American haiku poets. The second Cradle honored Robert Spiess of Madison, WI, one of the best early poets and editors of English language haiku journals.
So clearly, so unexpectedly, I truly almost fell over. Although it was not the answer any of us expected. It was the polar opposite from what I expected. I was left reeling.
Oh Grow my divine vines – Ana
“After the Heat Race, we made a change to the bike that really helped out in the Main Event,” said Dungey. “The track was hard-packed tonight and a little tough. I am really happy that I could get this win for the KTM team.”
If you want to read mine please stop by Ashley's blog to see 7 things that are inspiring me this Spring :)
As you might guess, I have a much simpler and much more satisfying proposal than Wagner's for solving this kind of continuing problem. Abolish the PLCB. Get the state out of the retail liquor and wine business, where it has no place. Privatize the sale of spirits and wine. Join the 21st Century. And leave this kind of embarrassment behind.
I.’ All descendents who migrated from Mahugwi. 3s** Chi iamaringa and Wafanenombo, had the same mother Matoto. The other three remained at Mahugwi (see NADA No. 27, 1950, P. 55).
What? Quiet girl turned wild? Big news. But for your information, that has always been me.
LaShawn – We have the most dominant quarter milers in the world and we’ll be ready to take on whoever steps into it. You can’t just get out there and run it. It takes work. It takes a certain mindset. If the US puts the team together that we can there is no country that can match up with our four legs. If we have four fresh legs to put up against any other four fresh legs we will be dominant.
'Know you are,' mutters Husband from the side of his.
I'll be back to my normal self soon, Mrs Coddy is looking after the toads, and Aunt Bench is making me plenty of hessian biscuits and snibble cake to see me through.
"I don't know why Romney has to pick on me, because I am the man that had the guts to send the helicopters into Iran. I risked my presidency, and lost, but at least I tried. What was Romney doing at that time? Oh, living off his dad's fortune. If I wasn't a Christian, I would tell him where to go, but hopefully people will see him as a rich man trying to buy the White House." Jimmy Carter told reporters.
6. Dance of the Cobra (7:42)
My stomach is in knots over this.
They said I know. We know
They found his body a couple of days later in a small stream. I saw the pictures. From head to toe, he was covered in bruises and the occasional burn from what looked like a hot iron. There were marks on his wrists and ankles of where he had been tied up. His body was contorted and broken, his face twisted in agony. It was brutally clear he had been tortured to death.
Suzy McKee Charnas – Boobs
Hope you are having a nice Valentine's Day!
- Moonbeam did her first real TINKLE on the potty frog!! She has now been promoted to celebrity status and wears her "pick ups" (pull ups) proudly. Her brother gave her a box of Nerds for her heroism. She sat back on the rinsed out potty chair eating them. Then to my horror she dropped one in, picked the wet candy out and stuffed it in her mouth - eeeww!! I told her "no no!!" When she was done sitting, her brother thought she had done something special again. That is until he discovered the items in the potty frog were none other than waterlogged Nerds ;-)
I happened to visit my neglected blogger account the other day to check out what I've been missing on blogs I follow and was shocked to discover I now have 8 followers! Thank you each for the honor and making me smile. Since your kind enough to follow my blog, it would be nice if I'd post a little something, eh?
Born Earvin Johnson, Jr. on August 14, 1959, in Lansing, Michigan, Magic Johnson was a point guard for the NBA and widely revered as the best in basketball history. Having won championships in high school, college, professional, and international levels, his professional career ended after thirteen seasons with the Los Angeles Lakers.
Gingrich: this is a very very serious
Which is better - One or two spaces after a period?
Two introductory studies in Great Britain and Canada have indicated that farmed salmon accumulate toxic dioxins and caricinogenic polychlorinated biphenyls, or PCB’s, at a far higher rate than their equivalents in the wild. PCBs and dioxins are chemicals that can affect normal development in children and do not break down in nature. Another study in 2003 concluded that farmed salmon found in American grocery stores contained 16 times the PCB content as wild salmon, while similar research in Canada, Ireland and Great Britain is taking place.
It felt incredible. Truly wonderful! Indulgent and self healing. Something I forget to do in this busy life, where every moment is filled with activities and chores, ways to fill your time beyond work. Always feeling like you need to see everyone of your friends and call all your family twice weekly. I called no one. No checking the blackberry or email or facebook every 30 minutes to see if there is something I missed; someone who may need me RIGHT NOW.
She realizes this is because you've fallen asleep (-20)
It's great that we get both perspectives of Puck and Sean. They're both such interesting and unique characters, it's hard not to feel a connection. By the end of the book, I couldn't help but to feel nostalgic. I've decided this is why I like series. I get to be excited and anticipate the next book. Puck and Sean's story is over, but it's one that will stay with me for a long while.
I can do without potato chips. They don’t do much for me. I never buy them for myself. I sometimes eat them if they come with a meal that was provided for me or if I just feel too lazy to ask for a substitution.
“Must the citizen ever for a moment, or in the least degree, resign his conscience to the legislator? Why has every man a conscience, then? I think that we should be men first, and subjects afterward. It is not desirable to cultivate a respect for the law, so much as for the right. The only obligation which I have a right to assume is to do at any time what I think right.”
so cute right? me and my southern ways love everything monogrammed or initials. but i wasn't about to pay $18 for one letter. i headed to my local fabric store and found these paper mache letters on sale for like $1.50:
They all matter.
Also, I thought of Marcona almonds because it was our daughter, Kelly who was responsible for my addiction to this snack/treat that goes so well with a slice of Manchego cheese (also her fault:-D) after her first trip to Spain. May is definitely a tough month for me with the anniversary of her death; my thoughts of her and everything she brought to my life becomes part of my day to day activities.
It's only the end of August and the Oregon Regency Society's first Regency Retreat is pretty much sold out! Imagine that! Our organizers have put together a nice, varied schedule of workshops and we are all looking forward to all the Regency fun!
Border Radio
It would depend on the SPL agreeing that such an event was not a liquidation so as to save Hibs or Dunfermline from relegation.
Today you turned nine years old.
Mouse in Wainscotting
Still we will attack
It is not uncommon for these highwaymen to retreat to the darkness of Woodbury Forest. The port city of Birg Nor on the Northren sea is a member of the Republic.
Taste wise it is pretty close to the smell. A very farmhouse taste of grains, some hopes, with some citrus (mainly oranges and lemon). It finishes fairly clean with a huge alcohol bite right at the end.
Breakfast was beef & eggs with coffee/cream.
Questions to answer on characterization:
Go ahead and tell me that's not a funny tshirt. I'd clean the house wearing that. I'd set that in my front yard, so that people who dared to cross my threshold knew that I was serious about my gnocchi.
I was hoping to share a video of Riley but since it seems that he has hidden my photo card there won't be new pictures until I find the magical place he stashed it. I've checked the usual spots and not had success. I sure hope he out grows this need to hid things soon. Tonight when I got home from work he decided it would be fun to hide himself in the fireplace. In the 6 years we have lived here it has never had a fire in it but apparently we don't dust there either... YUCK
The Christians are that multitude but Jews are not. On best estimates there are even 200 million Christians in China these days. So whom does this text best fit? Jews or Christians: "I will make of thee a great nation, and I will bless thee, and make thy name great; and thou shalt be a blessing: And I will bless them that bless thee, and curse him that curseth thee: and in thee shall all families of the earth be blessed. (Genesis 12:2-3)". It's a matter of opinion, of course but it is Christians who have both the numbers and the influence. And has not Christian civilization been a great blessing to the whole world? And "Jew" is much more often a curse than a blessing.
and it instantly reduced! A few days later, it was completely gone from his
The apostle John wrote in one of his letters “God is love.” This doesn’t mean God is a fluffy teddy bear. What it means is if you want to know what love looks like, if you want to know how love acts…look at God. Look at what He does.
(i) Author did nor know the home.
Contrasting the idea of dominion as domination, as well as this “renter’s mentality” toward creation is the perspective that God is working toward a holistic redemption, a restoration, a recreation of all things. In this alternative perspective, creation does not get burned up and destroyed in the end; it gets renewed along with you and me.
You can’t discount any print publication because it does not fit within the standards of broadsheet newspapers, often associated with high value news and discussion, but I would argue that the level of sensationalism within the tabloids has become so high that one could argue that it is not produced for the readers any more, simply the sales. Scare mongering and moral panics have become so integrated into the tabloid press that it is simply embedded in many of their articles in order to garner a response. Whilst it is no less valid and important than regular newspapers, one must be careful when selecting tabloid publications to read, especially as the headlines become more and more provocative.
* 2 teaspoons fresh fresh thyme, or 1 teaspoon dried thyme (optional)
Nov 8 – Scout Bar – San Antonio, TX (W/Cobra Starship)
The first condition is that she is, in fact, of the People of the Book. In other words, she must not be a heretic – for example, a communist or a Bahai. She must be a believing woman from among the People of the Book.
10. Been in a fist fight?
Emilee is at work today and we have been just doing more odds and ends around the house and in the Fiver. Tonight we will be going to the North 51 Grill to watch the Iowa game. It should be a fun evening.
Monday was a busy day; I was out of the house at half eight to go to work at one job, then back for a quick lunch before dashing out for the three-mile walk to the other job. Then I went and grabbed a couple of hours in the university library, ploughing through the opening scenes of 'Bad Romance', before going to the kick-off party, where I did hardly any writing but did meet a bunch of cool folks.
Above ground, the terminal’s exterior architecture is quite exquisite. The outside ground plane bends down to the hall and the roof structure above gestures toward the harbor. The result is a 148 ft high volume which focuses all attention to the south façade with views of the Hong Kong Central skyline, Victoria Peak and beyond. Much of the station’s roof is actually green so pedestrian can cross over the top, making it seem more like a park than a train station.
I learned to play Hambone, like many other children who grew up in North Philadelphia, whose parents or grandparents had migrated from the South.
State,’’ Aduba said.
Goodies Used: Whimsy sentiment scorpal,gems from mei flower,cardstock papermill
And David Stern, being the good little commissioner that he is, obliged. He completely and utterly went above and beyond his responsibilities as commissioner and effectively denied the Hornets the chance to receive market value for Paul while simultaneously crushing the hopes of one of the two biggest fan bases in the entire NBA.
even in this,
For those who have not seen the movie here is a little blurb about it...
United Breweries - UB Group Kingfisher Strong
2.Nadine (Berry/Freed)
JayBee Anama
Honestly, I’m a little anxious about it.
Under the direction of Dr. Delia Chiaramonte, University of Maryland Center for Integrative Medicine’s director of professional education, the students make a values list, which Chiaramonte says helps them consider whether they might suffer from undue stress because they’re not focusing on what’s truly important to them. They also learn to consider how daily stresses and triggers are affecting their lives, and they practice yoga and tai-chi.
Afterwards, the entire family watches Paranormal Activity which is terrifying. At the film’s denouement, I scream so loudly that Archie wakes up and climbs, panicked, onto Tom’s shoulders.
I am going to assume that NBC will not produce 22 eps of Smash next year. As is, 15 proved to more of an undertaking and even with that amount, there was much criticism of the quality in storytelling. They could always spread 15 eps through February, but my guess is they’re gonna want to take advantage of NFL Sunday and Voice Monday to launch a new hit after The Voice in the fall and use The Voice Winter season (I assume there will be 2 next year) to bring back Smash OR move it to Tue either in fall or Winter.
I fell apart a bit last night. I was making a birthday card for my dad – I found a copy of The Hobbit in this incredible book shop & it was a 75th year edition. My father used to read me The Hobbit as a little girl & although I wasn’t going to get him a birthday present because I’m mad at him for not replying to emails, I changed my mind. Got a bit teary & emotional. It’s hard, having to step back from people you love to put yourself first.
I've done this and came across Broken Angels by Richard Morgan which I would never have picked up before. Really enjoyed it and quite enjoyed the randomness of finding a book; almost like going on a blind date. To really spice it up don't restrict yourself to a genre.
Nell Walton is an avid horsewoman and also owns two wild horses, both of which came from a herd near Elko, NV. She is also the founder and managing editor of the online equestrian news magazine, The AllHorses Post (www.allpetspost.org/allhorsespost). She has degrees in journalism and biology from the University of Arkansas, spent many years as a professional journalist and worked as an intern for former President Bill Clinton when he was governor of Arkansas. She lives in East Tennessee on a small horse farm with her husband, four horses, one donkey, two cats and two dogs. The Bone Trail is her first novel.
I've been busy hunting for the studio space near my home.
A GREAT Easter Egg Hunt!
Attachment is not what we need to be seeking. It's what we think we should look for but truly what we want, as humans with this great capacity for love, is connection. We want to find people to share our true selves with who don't run screaming once they hear our darkest thoughts, our past mistakes and our future foibles. We want people who accept us truly as the incredible spirit we are, not as the fallible human we exist as. We want to be judged fairly by our soul, not our behaviour.
and this my heart realized before my brain.. this serving of Him and not them.
I have a very small chin; I had no idea it was always under many Chinese chins!
What is the next place that Yelp is going to spread?!
Scarf buying season is dwindling down but I'm just getting started on making them. Thanks to Mom and her endless supply of knitting needles and crochet hooks, I am knitting and crocheting (I just learned and am so excited about it) up a storm! It's a great hobby for a nursing mom and it beats playing games on my phone to pass the time :)
I assume these would also be available for those of you on Android devices, but you'll just have to search them out yourself, because (obviously) I'm a hard core Apple girl (no pun intended).
that the notecards become available for purchase,
“The Governor wants him alive,” the tracker interjected.
I don't always find Friendly Plastic quite as friendly as I would like ... but for small pieces of jewellery and lids and flat surfaces that I want to cover ... well ... it really is fabulous ... very effective and really quite simple.
Look at the current crop of dictators running from North Korea through China in an unbroken arc through Central Asia, Pakistan, the Middle East, North Africa, and down to Angola, with three dictatorships: Belarus, Haiti, and Cuba; if you look at that those 43 men, no women (there are no lady grrl dictators happy to report); look at what they are doing today—once again they are the cause of refugee flows; they are the cause of terrorism, direct and indirect; they are the cause of wars; they are the cause of poverty, in Africa, particularly, but also in the Middle East, where the World Bank recently has shown that if you could have normal governance, democratic governance in the Middle East, that there would be a real
Good Morning everyone! Thanks for joining us for another Peachy Keen Stamps Challenge! I think you're *really* going to love this one! I had a blast looking at our design team's creations!
twenty-five thousand,
Brandish swordlike the slick sharp steel of your vocabulary, curry no fear nor favour in your quest to slice open the arteries of creative expression.
My hop vines in the back yard are all intertwined, so I have no idea of hop variety or alpha-value specifics for this particular brewing session. All that I know is, there were these varieties in varying amounts that I added to the brew: Cascade, Centennial, Columbus, Willamette, Saaz...a regular "smorgasbord / potpourri" of hops. I love the element of surprise, when I'm brewing my annual harvest ale(s). Last year's version was magnificent!
“It hurts,” NFL network draft analyst Mike Mayock said of Cody’s weigh-in. “And it a wasn’t clean 370.”
Once I have my pieces traced...I don't add a seam allowance...I cut them out of the freezer paper and iron them to the right side of the fabric. Shiny side down toward the fabric.
A condominium management board in Ottawa, Ontario, has ruled that a the owner of a plug-in hybrid vehicle can’t use an electrical outlet in his building’s garage unless he buys his own $3,000 meter.
Starring: Jeffrey Combs, Bruce Abbott, Barbara Crampton and David Gale Director: Stuart Gordon
the Dachshund Races that were part
Henri drives the entire time. Between breaks and the creation of the new documents, it takes about thirty hours. I spend most of the time napping or playing video games. Because of my reflexes, I can master most of the games quickly. The longest it has taken me to beat any of them is about a day. I like the alien war and space games the best. I pretend I’m back on Lorien, fighting Mogadorians, cutting them down, turning them to ash. Henri thinks it’s weird and tries to discourage me from doing it. He says we need to live in the real world, where war and death are a reality, not pretend. As I finish my latest game, I look up. I’m tired of sitting in the truck. The clock on the dash reads 7:58. I yawn, wipe my eyes.
And I was unfortunately situated near the big ass heater.
Pick #6
While he is elusive in the flesh he does make a pretty decent beer. Noticeable burnt cocoa, a milk fortified malt, a well-sifted though silted coffee and a bite which is much tamer than the eerie and wild whooping bark which the bigfoot is noted for and feared because of.
Until Next Time, Happy Railfanning! Remember, if you have any leads for future blogs, send them to me, You will be credited!
Thank you, Nikolay!
Meanwhile in apartheid-fundo 3rd World Malaysia . . . see below article . . .
His aunt made us pomegranate martinis. Have I mentioned how much I love her? By this time, Mailman Mike and his girlfriend had arrived and they joined in on the drinking.
In fact the reverse is true, just like the leaders of North Korea or the old Soviet Union knew that their subject peoples would no longer be so compliant if they learnt the truth about the outside world, the fat controllers who steer public perceptions have no wish for the public to know the truth about alternative viewpoints.
Stay tuned for the Rest of the Story in the next Panic Button blog entry.
Bastianich recalls one night during the Monica Lewinsky scandal, when the gregarious Clinton loudly tells an off-color joke involving lesbians and Jerry Brown within earshot of journalists, even though Bastianich tries to warn him. The story goes viral the next day.
The interactive window shows a 3D Christmas scene with snowfall, train, gift box and toys. Each toy has a price tag with a QR code on it. People can scan the code using the eBay application and instantly donate the toy on the spot.
Thanks to James Cameron and others, I had the good fortune to take my two boys to see the 3D release of the movie Titanc today.
This weekend start the Post-Season for high school cross country. This Saturday will be the Nike Cross Nationals in Portland and the 12th will see the long standing Footlocker Nationals. Illinois and Texas will be well represented at both events and should challenge for several titles.
As usual Auster doesn't address the criticism that's actually aimed at him. Instead he complains hypocritically about "personal attacks" and "reckless indifference to factual truth" and changes the subject. And of course the subject that he really wants to talk about is the threat to jews posed by Gottfried's blunt words concerning their dim views of "Christians", ie. Europeans.
Just to refresh your memory, here are the most recent pictures of our playroom area. There are two nice size closets in this room and in between the closets there is a built in desk. The room has carpeting which our dog thinks is also her potty area, pleasant I know. For some reason I only have a few pictures of this room, I either didn't take anymore or the rest are hiding because even they are embarrassed of the state this room was in.
Mix the butter and brown sugar until well combined
Again, there is a way around this. This time, when entering the first part of the code - just leave the address bit blank: the bit that fits between the two " marks. Just don't leave a space in between them.
Paper: SU black, grey, perfect plumb, DP-SU
Not just because I sell socks either, mostly because the world needs a bunch more whimsy 364 days a year and not just on one lucky one.
The only mass communication means we have of getting our message out is via the internet, but, valuable tool as it is, we have restricted ourselves to serious political sites, forums and blogs where we debate serious issues amongst ourselves. We don't go where the young folk go, and when we try, we get thrown out because we don't know how to behave.
bake couple of hours in a slow oven
It’s just that I simultaneously imagine Jeremy disowning Elena. Like I’ve said before, she makes more sense in the triangle than she does as someone who cares about the people she grew up with. Right now I care more about her working it out with the Salvatores than I care about her keeping the people that she loves. Jeremy needs to say deuces and so does Bonnie. It’s b.s. that Jeremy has to “accept” Delena because of this and this and this. Because “this” focuses solely on Elena. Which would be fine…if Jeremy didn’t have reason to completely dislike Damon.
This? Is my fantasy hair. The reality is that I would always put it behind my ears and end up with a butt-crack part. My hair looked like this for about a minute in college - before the hormonal soup of my thirties gave me curly hair.
This attitude is true of an increasing proportion of the population. In most cases it is perfectly healthy, most certainly for the economy, but at its most excessive it can cause some really rather distasteful behaviour. Since its inception, the CCP has been incredibly touchy about aspects of its population being portrayed negatively, and the stock answer of ‘influenced by Western immorality’ was – and still is – trundled out as a common explanation/verdict. Essentially, the West was (and is) the scapegoat for whatever unfavourable aspects of society the party didn’t want to take responsibility for. However, with the rising prevalence of this ‘greed is good’ (or “to get rich is glorious,” as Mr Deng famously said) mentality and the associated distasteful behaviour that seems to come along with it, this excuse becomes less and less compelling.
“There are those devices that are donates – but some part is missing, or they didn’t come with an instruction booklet – or the booklet is in a foreign language…” he shakes his head.
Despite my two gripes, this is still a pretty magnificent comic. It's a lot of fun to read, and the art is sure to please. Tardi is a real master of the medium and I'm glad his stuff is getting translated and published here in the states. I can definitely see myself gobbling up everything of his they decide to publish. I strongly recommend The Arctic Marauder or anything else by Jacques Tardi, even the stuff I haven't read, because I think he's a comic creator that everyone who enjoys the medium should experience at least once. If you wanna double up and get your comic fix and steampunk fix at the same time, then this is the one for you.
After crashing his car
EKWQR Blog (ekwqrblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
Whenever I look at these postcards, I wish I had my sister's drawing skills...
One pretty much knows what one is in for with a film titled The Nude Vampire, and Jean Rollin's second feature (his first in color) certainly delivers on the promise of stiff acting, absurd plotting, and blatantly exploitative sequences that offer little besides titillation. What's notable about this film, though, is that it's also sensuous, moody, chilling, and strangely poetic, a trashy B-movie with copious nudity that intermittently becomes something much stranger and more mysterious. It's a very visual film, its dialogue sparse, and what little there is of it mostly silly and inconsequential. It's the images that matter, images of a surreal, unsettling strangeness — unsettling because Rollin's aesthetic is so matter-of-fact, making the supernatural and the bizarre seem utterly quotidian.
I expect it must have been Klove who did all the necessary travelling around and sweeping up. One of the consequences of keeping Scars of Dracula in-continuity with the earlier movies is that Troughton’s playing a character with the same name and job as someone who was apparently shot dead in Dracula, Prince of Darkness. Is this meant to be the same Klove, miraculously recovered?
The welfare of our souls and bodies also depends on two-way forgiveness. Guilt and bitterness eat away at us. Both are associated with personality troubles and physical ailments. We can make both a matter of prayer. “Forgive us our debts” takes care of our true moral guilt for the things that we do wrong. And because we have forgiveness, we can take honest assessments of ourselves, which hastens our sanctification. However, because bitterness is as bad or worse that unresolved guilt, Jesus tells us to link the two. “Father, forgive us to the same degree that we forgive others.” Jesus has more to say on this, and I will defer more comments until that time as well. Suffice it to say that it is unbalanced to ask to have our guilt removed so that we can stand comfortably in the Father’s presence, when there are people that we exclude from our lives because they wronged us. If it is good for us to receive forgiveness, it is even better that we give it. Plus, if we have a heart that carries no grudges, then we have confidence at this point in our prayer that we have received the Father’s forgiveness. That is an excellent thing.
I've planned out my first 2 weeks of meal ideas, but I'd love to have suggestions for other dishes to try over the next month and a half. If you have a great idea for a vegetarian dish, please share in the Linky below. I love trying new dishes and can't wait to see all of your fabulous recipes!
Gay: An adjective meaning “happy.” Maybe be used with “so-called” to refer to those who choose to be homosexuals.
We went to the BarcAlien invasion HQ, the Nou Camp without our “backbone”. That little left footed World Wizard of Year scored 4 goals and ended our Champions League adventure for the season.
So from now on, there will be days when the house is a mess because we're only in it long enough to cause a scene. We can't be troubled to stick around and take care of it. We're too busy pinkening our noses.
This simply constitutionally kills all other articles (22, 24, 95, Preamble H ) and any attempt to reform the system. In other words, the writers of the constitution say: If you make the system secular, all that you’ll get is a new civil war.
"Writing: a way of leaving no space for death, of pushing back forgetfulness, of never letting oneself be surprised by the abyss. Of never becoming resigned, consoled; never turning over in bed to face the wall and drift asleep again as if nothing had happened; as if nothing could happen." All of these walls. I am using, I think, threaded imagery. Perhaps I should check before I begin teaching writing? Can one teach writing? Or does one write because one is compelled propelled and it is impossible to think of anyway to live if documentation did not occur, one would feel like one was stifled and needed to scream and felt itchy and exhausted and not there.
Los Blancos were to deal Granada a bitter blow when Benzema’s cross into the box in injury time was turned into his own net by David Cortes to gift Mourinho’s side all three points as Moises and Siqueira saw red cards after the final whistle.
But last night something miraculous happened. I went to my daughter’s band banquet. It was just the two of us and it not only felt right but in the end I’m very glad it was just her and I. She had a rough night. She didn’t get put into some leadership positions for next year that she thought she deserved. She showed a brave face but as soon as we got into the car the bawling began.
Sub Group: Uichan-SHIN
Paper: Authentique Splendid (Richness, Delight, Majesty)
Believe in yourself. Trust God and remember, you don’t have to do it alone.
Mr. Martin never smiled. He always had a scowl on his face, and more often than not it was because of something I did. He was a tough disciplinarian, but always fair. The punishment always fit the crime, and his goal was always to teach, more than to punish. Of course I didn't see it that way at the time, but in hindsight it's clear. All he really wanted was for me to get my act together and make something of my life. And he always knew I could, once I stopped screwing up and figured out what was important.
To close, I would say this is overall a very pedestrian attempt at novel writing. But that would be very rude. To the pedetrians. So instead, I reckon you rent in a 1970s Bollywood DVD instead of reading this… this… thing.
Isn't this great fabric? I've had it in my stash for years waiting for the perfect pattern. Hopefully a little girl in Japan will love it.
I went with Douglas Adams, specifically Dirk Gently's Holistic Detective Agency. It's odd that I hadn't read it before being a fan of Adams. It was great. I love comic time machine stories, Connie Willis' To Say Nothing of the Dog is a big favorite of mine. After I finished Dirk Gently's, I polished off that memoir of a guy in a psych ward that I started last week on a graveyard, Nervous System by Jan Lars Jensen. It wasn't great, but interesting and provides good insight on the thought process of psychotics.
Well I better get the car loaded. (Or get my hubby to get the car loaded. LOL)
Have a wonderful holiday and if you have any tips for me and my friend while we're in Italy, leave a comment or e-mail me! I'm off to watch Roman Holiday and The Talented Mr. Ripley! Ciao!
OverWatcher
Why pay more at the door and stand in line for badge registration when you can pre-register online in the comfort of your own home? Not only that but you can also personalize your badge with a nickname unique to you or your cosplay character! We accept both PayPal and all major credit cards as payment.
feeling its way
Are those the kind of mates you would like for eternal company especially as they will be writhing in pain just like you?
As soon as the children turned from the canal they could see their parents' cottage. Their mother's tall form, arrayed in jacket and petticoat and close fitting cap, stood like a picture, in the crooked frame of the doorway. Had the cottage been a mile away, it would still have seemed near. In that flat country every object stands out plainly in the distance; the chickens show as distinctly as the windmills. Indeed, were it not for the dykes and the high banks of the canals, one could stand almost anywhere in middle Holland without seeing a mound or a ridge between the eye and the "jumping-off place."
That come May
Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu: Winner.
There is another inconsistency, the contrast in his attitudes about racism and anti-semitism, that a comment from his correspondent Tom M. triggers him to highlight:Regarding the “I am attacked for not being an anti-Semite” thread, hasn’t the term “anti-Semite” become an all-inclusive, imprecisely defined word, used for effect the way “racist” is being used? Whether one has good reasons for making racial distinctions or not, the label “racist” is used to undercut any rational discussion of race. Likewise hasn’t the label “anti-Semite” become a description to stop at any cost a rational consideration of the effects of influential Jewish persons and their thought processes on society?Auster’s answer to this is that the only proper path is to very carefully separate what is rational and legitimate criticism from that which is not. He then calls Tom M. an anti-semite for not professing philo-semitism. This is rational? This is legitimate?
This is the first toy I will be playing with when the Christmas craziness is over!
It has been something of an emotional roller coaster and has rendered me a hopeless romantic. It has been full of heartache and heartbreak but has made me stronger for it. It has humbled me in ways I never thought it could.
I hope that you had a wonderful holiday weekend, everyone!
My interview/promotions process thing happens Tuesday afternoon, and I've been prepping for it since early June. Early JUNE, people!!
Furthermore, Paul draws upon the theme of the Holy Spirit to seal his exhortation. Paul warns that to reject this command is a reject of God, more specifically the Spirit which God has given them. The Spirit was to Paul the fulfillment of Gods promise to purify and renew the people of God (Ezekiel 36:25-27; 37:14). It was an indicator of the inauguration of the messianic age and as we see from Galatians and Romans, Paul saw the Spirit as the eschatological ethos in which the people of God live and by which they war against the flesh (or the present age). Therefore, to live and please God with our vessels (v. 4) is completely in line with Gods new age that is experienced now by being in the Spirit. Therefore to reject this commandment is to war against the Spirit and to reject God.
22 THE US owes the United Nations $1bn in unpaid dues. Yet it spends the same amount on its military pro gramme every 23 hours.
Mangoes, Ataulfo — Mexico
Los Angeles County District Attorney Steve Cooley believes the change will increase crime and lead judges to impose shorter sentences because they know the county already has overcrowded jails. Some officials say parolees may have a better chance to be rehabilitated under county care because they will have access to drug treatment and programs offered by faith-based and community groups. “If we do the work and involve the community, I firmly believe that we can make a significant difference,” said Ralph Miller, president of the Los Angeles County Deputy Probation Officers Union.
In the novel, the answer may not be what you’d think. IN THE AFTER should be ready for press in late 2012.
In the Bhakti tradition it is said that everyone has the responsibility to become a teacher, a guide, a selfless sharer of the essence they are finding. Understanding the real tools, the real apps, of our spiritual life and seeing their immense value in our daily life can help us to become givers of the Divine, of God’s reality. It can bring us to the simplicity of our being, and allow us to give the ultimate sophistication.
“We all have problems, but you are completely failing to realize your biggest problem,” Zero paused, letting Piper soak in what he had to say. “You are not the only game in town. Understand?” He placed the phone gently back in its cradle and eyed Michael. He enjoyed the way the slovenly mass of human wretchedness squirmed in his presence. Of all the fear Zero had ever relished in, Michael’s was by far the most fulfilling.
Ship building continued for a while in Rotherhithe. Lavender Dock Shipyard was used for ship building between 1865 and 1870 by John and William Walker who specialized in composite ships including the Mikado (1868), the Ambassador (1869) and the Lothair (1870). The last of the large ships to be built on Rotherhithe was the Lothair. She was a 825 ton (gross) ship built of wood and iron and was one of the fastest clippers ever to be built but was lost at sea in 1910. The picture to the left is the714 ton Ambassador. There are some simply amazing photographs of the surviving beached remains of the Ambassador in San Gregorio in Chile on Lago Cardiel's Flickr site (one of which is shown in thumbnail here, below left, with a link to the correct page). Cardiel's page also provides a history of the ship in "translation engine English" (if you read Spanish the much better option is to look at the original page from which the translation is taken, which also has some terrific photos of the wreck). Her figurehead was rescued in the 70's and today can be seen in the Patagonian Institute in Punta Arenas (Chile). The survival of the remains is due to the fact that instead of being scrapped she was beached and abandoned. She was pillaged for parts but astonishingly the wooden parts of her frame survive. Apart from the Cutty Sark (or what remains of it since it burned due to an industrial vacuum cleaner catching fire overnight) it is, as far as I know, the only surviving composite ship.
I glance at Maggie. I’m sure I can actually see her heart pounding.
As I journey threw the day
“This man then organized a band of some twelve assistants to travel around the country, carrying Dilger’s germs in small glass phials stopped with corks through which a needle extended. This roving band jabbed their deadly needles into the livestock.
On 21 February 2012, Jordan commenced proceedings against Qiaodan in China for the 'unauthorised use of his name'. Unfortunately, this Kat has not been able to find a copy of the complaint as filed, but she understands from an official Jordan website (specifically dedicated to provide information on the proceedings) that in it Jordan alleged that Qiaodan 'deliberately and aggressively used Michael Jordan’s name without his permission and misled Chinese consumers'. This dedicated website further explains that the complaint was based on 'naming rights' rather than trade mark rights because 'the injury to Michael Jordan as an individual is the misuse of his name and other personal attributes' and was brought now following recent decisions by Chinese courts in favour of protecting the naming rights of other well known basketball players such as Yao Ming in 2011 and Yi Jianlian in 2010.
Now - and this is a genuine question - can someone tell me what those guys got out of that???
family and nation issues intertwined
She has appeared in nearly 50 Films and on dozens of TV series over the course of her career.
The congo will also be participating in The Spotted Box for March. If you've ever bought one, then you know you can get lots of wonderful goodies in the box, in sample size. Be sure to buy one, and look for items from the Creative Mamas.
Beach House- Bloom (hipster dream pop favs)
But still those who are left will smile in the face of tyrants
on his cell phone going off, reminding me to arise
Not only is there a surplus of genre product, but it's not watered down. Aside from the fact that some of these films and shows are duds, it's not due to censorship but due to creative shortcomings. When I read about Henry: Portrait of a Serial Killer in GZ, I had to legitamately wonder if I'd ever get to see that movie. Most of Tony Timpone's GZ editorials back then were about the struggles that filmmakers (especially indie filmmakers) faced with the intractable, and frequently small-minded, judgements of the MPAA. Today, not even the likes of A Serbian Film has to worry about distribution.
But here’s the thing: I regularly hear my writer pals berate themselves for not getting on with their writing. They may feel they’re wasting time, they may think they’re slacking if they aren’t churning out words every single day. There’s this constantly nagging voice, it seems, screeching “Write, write, you must write at all costs or it will be hellfire and brimstone for you, you filthy slacker!” Perhaps it’s that Protestant work ethic on speed?
The judiciary also found itself being bullied and sullied during the lead-up to the Iraq War. If the Chilcot Enquiry did nothing else (and it didn’t achieve much) it pointed up how a spin doctor with ambition where his brains should be, and a Prime Minister in search of his legacy, could pervert the course of justice. Justice was almost certainly foiled in relation to Arab arms deals, a potential murder inquiry, and the legality of a war declaration: an Attorney General pinned against the wall by a spin-doctor can hardly think of himself as ‘independent’.
I choose to spend 20 minutes a day with each of my children to help them feel loved and accepted! Amen!
Happy Sketch Days!
"It calms me. Relaxes me. It's my thang" I tell them.
I got loads of gingham at Wal-mart for $1.50 a yard. I was able to make 32 napkins and 4 runners, and still have leftover fabric.
Once I’ve claimed my spot I go back stage for candid shot of the models and designer’s. Getting back stage footage as well as crowd shots is important to me. It gives me a chance to show people what it’s like to be at a fashion show. Often I will take video as well, maybe getting a quick interview with a designer or getting a models shout out about the show. It is also a great opportunity to promote yourself! Talk up the models and designer’s as well as the crowd, hand out your cards and tell people where they can go to see these photo’s. You want people to visit your site, blog or portfolio. This is really important if your a photographer for hire, get your name out there!
Turmeric is a compulsory ingredient used to marinate satay, which gives the dish its idiosyncratic offensive blush. Meats commonly used entail beef, mutton, pork, venison, fish, shrimp, squid, treacherous, rabbit and continuous ranting. Some retain again used bounteous exotic meats, agnate now turtle, crocodile, horse, lizard, and snake meat.
Awesome cards! Thank you for playing along with our challenge. Please feel free to grab our Top 3 blinkie from the sidebar.
Now, my problem is that this little girl loves it! she is going to be so sad when I give it to her cousin! :(
Don’t you just love nature? My wife and son love the place. They went hiking up to the middle most part of the field, I was just there at the entrance taking photos as usual, lol.
3. Quick! You wake up with 10 minutes left to get out the door. What is your go-to piece of clothing that makes you look put-together?
Whipped is a very creamy lubricant that is edible and contains skin softening shea butter. I was sent the Original and the Sugar Cookie, but there are also other flavors available to enjoy. These products are perfect for c-rings, sleeves, polyurethane condoms and really anywhere that is going to be massaged. I have never been one into actually wanting to try edible lubricants but I did however put a little dab of each onto my finger to try the taste.I was pleasantly surprised by the flavor. My hubby likes how soft the lubricant was and how it gives that extra lubrication to our toys and simply just for playing around with each other. I was quite happy that there was no skin irritation that occurred during our review. If you are looking to help spice up in the bedroom then these products are a great way to do just that.
After months of beating around the bush, Vietnamese Prime Minister Nguyen Tan Dung has finally released an official claim to the Paracal and Spratly Islands. Vietnam was the formal the occupier of the Paracel and Spratly Islands since the 18th and 19th centuries, until the Chinese invaded Paracel in 1974, and Spratly in 1988. The Nguyen Dynasty of Vietnam was the first country to explore and occupy these islands, becoming the sole patron of both Spratly and Paracel for nearly two centuries. In the 1950′s onward, the Republic of Vietnam held the islands.
This is of course ludicrous, but there’s no special reason why abortion should fall into the beethoven argument while other, baby-inhibiting practices such as abstinence, contraception, common sense and desire for a non-tribulated vagina don’t. You can try and dig yourself out of this hole but it’s likely to end in disaster provided the emphasis of producing “great people” is encouraged in terms of birth/non-birth determinants. Encouraging great people to breed with each other to produce greater children, while dis-encouraging less successful people to breed smacks of eugenics… no wait it is eugenics. I don’t think there is an escape for it.
Ariela sniffled as her nose started to run just a bit. Her good eye was itchy and watery too.
Small, easy, creative and good for the environment. What’s not to like?
During his speech at the 1980 Republican convention: I must confess that I’ve been a little afraid to suggest what I’m going to suggest – I’m more afraid not to – that we begin our crusade joined together in a moment of silent prayer.
excited to catch up with each one of you!!!
by Peder Jensen, a.k.a. Fjordman
Announced to be airing as a 2-cour series in the noitaminA timeslot, directed by Death Note director Tetsurō Araki and with the screenwriters for Code Geass, Hiroyuki Yoshino and Ichirō Ōkouchi, all of this being handled by the studio Production I.G. – a studio with a track record for excellent series – Guilty Crown was understandably being hyped to hell and back. The general description for it included talk of a mysterious virus, strange powers, and an anti-government resistance group. Aside from the virus stuff, it sounded awfully lot like the good part of Code Geass, and with the staff to back that up. Exciting stuff! Everybody was eager, anxious in their anticipation, predicting it would be the best show of the fall season. What could go wrong?
I see no reason to worry now.
2. We went to the David Sutherland showroom for out last stop and they had these gorgeous light fixtures. I could imagine this particular luminaire at a high-end/up-town boardroom.
5. Something she knows
On down the Apache Trail we went. I only yelped once. There are some places that you just need to experience. Photography (at least mine) do it no justice. There is no way to share the enormity of the canyons and cliff walls, just as I could never capture the majesty of Alaska's mountains when driving right next to them.
piece of wool or shepherd's staff
-fixing America's political landscape
Pre-heat the oven to 400F and bake the buns for 18-20 mins or until the top is golden brown. Remove from the oven and cool completely. Once cooled, frost them with egg white beaten with powdered sugar & thinned with milk if needed. It should be a thick frosting so that it doesn't drip away from the buns.
It is like a family writ large. Sometimes one is despised and does not get the care that makes one feel worthy. This is what is causing immoral behaviour and a giving up amongst our working classes who are neglected for immigrants.
oil the fish using a paper towel or pastry brush
Well, let me tell you that you mean so much for me and I have no answer for your question, friend. One thing that I know is, I’m happy to be your friend and you don’t have to care about whatever people think about you.
(Scott and me are are attempting a tag team blog post on our layover in Salt Lake City–let’s see how it goes)
Don't worry; I am not going to plot the downfall of my copy editor.
The KIS Covered Courts erupted with sounds of excitement and fun Easter Sunday April 8th, when Christian Endeavour, better known as CE, held their Easter Celebration. Eighty students were in attendance, as they had a time of music, a message, and games. A live band played a few tunes for worship, a game imitating the American TV show “Man vs. Food,” where 4 students were challenged to eat 3 Faye’s Chicken Grilled Burgers, a short Easter message, and finally the covered courts were opened for the students to enjoy sports like indoor soccer, basketball, and volleyball. One of our graduating seniors walked away with the prize for Man vs. Food, leaving all of his opponent’s way behind him as he finished his burger in record time. This was the first event CE had like this the entire year and the leaders couldn’t have asked for a better turn out. CE has been a staple program for the students for many years now. The students look forward to coming weekly to CE to spend time with their friends in a nonthreatening youth church service, where relevant teaching and great music is enjoyed. John Devadoss, under the care of Pastor Raja Krishnamorthy, has done a great job making this happen for the past two years.
These boys are pretty precious to me, but they're wild little things. So moments like these are totally photo worthy.
KERS 2009
Jeanie, as I knew her in the first grade, had freckles and blue eyes and a sense of humor that made me happy. I looked forward to seeing her every day. We were in the same one-room school, along with 28 or 30 other students, grades 1-8. Every day she and I took our lunches over to an old Osage Orange tree that had a limb near the ground, looking for all the world like it was reaching down, just so school kids could sit there. We'd unlock our lunch boxes and talk about classes we'd had that day. Her being a year older and in the second grade, she was more knowledgeable. But since I sat behind her, my being the only one in the first grade, I got to listen in to her lessons and learn second grade material.
In a recent piece for World Trademark Review, "Mark including word element ‘Lenin’ cannot be registered", Vladimir Biriulin (Gorodissky & Partners, Moscow) explains the refusal of the Patent Office to allow registration of a trade mark which included the name "Lenin", a decision subsequently upheld by the Chamber of Patent Disputes. He writes:
CEUs are available for social workers through the Association of Social Work Boards (ASWB). Each webinar is worth one (1) CEU and requires the successful completion of a ten-question post-test (sold separately).
Here is a brief run down of our day:
I told Barman I liked his bar but I wanted a bathroom. Barman told me girls climb the hill behind the bar, that there was a "Girls Bathroom" up there and I would "know it when I saw it." He and Al cheered me on as I climbed the hill. Then Barman yelled, "HEY, you forgot something" and fired a roll of toilet paper at my face.
Works great for "drop cookies"! Also works well filling mini-muffin cups without making a mess. Once again, for both uses, this scoop creates uniform measures of the item for even and consistent baking. Here's a waist-friendly {really, I'm not kidding} Chocolate Peanut Butter "drop cookie" recipe if you want to give a small ice cream scoop a try!
- Put 1-2 tablespoons of stuffing, don’t fill the whole vegetable with stuffing to give space for rice to expand during cooking. Cover the green peper with it’s top you choped off.
- She understands 'Canal etiquette,' meaning she automatically moves aside to allow other people to pass when we are walking there (e.g. bikers, runners).
At the root of America’s economic crisis lies a moral crisis: the decline of civic virtue among America’s political and economic elite. A society of markets, laws and elections is not enough if the rich and powerful fail to behave with respect, honesty and compassion toward the rest of society and the world. ~ Jeffrey Sachs -The Price of Civilization
“Phil, who is a member of the Navajo Nation Council, grew up in Red Valley in uranium mining camps, watching children playing on waste piles and drinking water from the mines. The water also was used to mix infant formula,” she writes in her chapter titled, “Winning the Battle, Losing the War.”
And with a gentle hand
A couple weeks ago, Dude and I went to a local county fair and walked around the buildings that hold all those businesses hawking their wares. You know the ones: waterless cookware, ginsu knives, vacuums, jewelry, Avon, Tastefully Simple, etc. Out of the corner of my eye I saw one of those slushie machines you see at gas stations and some bars. Vino Frappe. I so had to sample that! Tasty, tasty is all I can say. They had a special going on so I got two bags and giddily skipped out of the building in search of junk food-found that too.
Why am I so sad? Why am I so upset? I should put my hope in God and keep praising him, my Savior, my God.
It reflects well on Paul that he is still willing to get hitched after the ignominy of his second marriage. Let us never forget the calumnies that emerged from the poisonous tongue of Ms Heather Mills, who accused her husband, among other things, of being obsessed about her breasts. The woman was clearly unfit for matrimony – an honest wife would have thanked her lucky stars that he wasn’t obsessed about another woman’s breasts. Yet in spite of the humiliations and pecuniary losses he suffered at the hands of his ex-wife, Paul is now taking the plunge with another woman (albeit of very different temperament, one hopes). All those sappy romantic lyrics he wrote must have genuinely come from the heart.
and touch her chest to release the pain.
Pack 24
The Long Kiss Goodnight
1) ED Virginia - 0.88
3. Use club soda instead of water to make super fluffy pancakes. This works so well it is crazy. You really need to try this. The bubbles in the club soda make the pancakes light as air.
Scorn and loathing to those wee katechons who restrain, who make nice, who tell you to sit down. Whose breath reeks of the word peace as if they've long been drinking from the toilet.
Note: I did not attached these, neither did I fill up the address I will stay in Myanmar.
“So, what can Elm Publishing do that is different.
ANYWAY, she recently had a cool post about Codecademy, which seeks to teach people how to code in the same way that Rosetta Stone wants to teach you Spanish: by applying skills right off the bat rather than teaching theory first, practical skills later.
8 forward
That was eventful. 7-1 loss. And the refs played for the other team. Ahh well. Should be used to that by now playing against peninsula.
the perfect pebble?
Given the paucity of speakers, twice yesterday those testifying took advantage of the opportunity to speak again. After Chan spoke, Audrey Doyle, a 40-year resident--which she announced because everyone seemingly was claiming bona fides--returned to the podum,.
They sometimes say beer is about the people who make it & drink it & I couldn't agree more in this case. It is just such a pleasure to share something we had such fun, creating & nursing, with you. If you can't make it to Cask on May 5th, the two aged versions will be available in May.
Purchased from/price: Meijer, $20 each
Ask God to take you to ‘O’ (zero) so He can then exalt you beyond measure.
a topic, this is a matter, an issue that has to be discussed
In My Arms
Children are a separate class of people. Until, of course, they inevitably grow up to be adults, and then magically they can be included as full members of society, simply because they have taken the proper number of trips around the sun, even if they have been excluded from the real world for most of that time.
My angst is not because we missed out on some beautiful pics. What really annoys me is the self righteous stance that all these activists take. I think that it is a vocation for the jobless and the retired, who don’t find peace sitting in arm chairs. Agreed, all such movements are towards making the world a better place, but is that about it? Shouldn’t this be an ongoing process instead of simple spending a day of the year, in this case an hour.
Are you blessed to have family in your life? Family is such a gift. Can you attest?
This comes back to the false dichotomy of the ‘mad / bad’ debate: we seem to have ingrained an approach which says you are either criminally responsible OR you are mentally ill. In fact, you could be both. Or neither and we more urgently need a criminal justice decision-making model which reflects this.
“Damn,” I said as I started bleeding everywhere. This was bad. I had arrived late to the Dojo due to the speaker at convocation that morning taking 18 centuries to get his point across, and there was simply no time to stem the flow of blood. To make matters worse, my pristine white Gi and white belt were now peppered with dark red spotsspots.
Don't let them boss you around or cloud your judgement. This IS the only way, and they all know it, you know it. F isn't just a letter, there are no girls on Earth besides Mindy and your life is over now. Repeat this mantra daily before and after breakfast, lunch and dinner and you'll be firm as a rock in your beliefs.
Another realisation hit me today: this Jubilee Heart (it is the Queen's Diamond Jubilee this year, in case you didn't already know!) is my FIRST cross stitch completion of 2012. This is very unusual for me. Last year was a slow year for cross stitching for me, but I had still managed to complete at least one small project a month, and I think I had a total of 6 completions by this time last year. But this is my first of 2012.
When I first used it I felt it wasn't conditioning enough, my hair felt tangled after and it didn't feel particularly well conditioned.. The next time I used it I tried a different approach and ended up using more of each product, especially the conditioner. With the shampoo it was nothing like Id been used to, it was a runny liquid as apposed to the gel consistency you normally get, so shampooing with it took a bit more care.. I took my time as it didn't foam as well as my usual shampoo and I also found that I had to be careful with it in my palm so not to let it run away down the plug hole! I also felt it needed more working due to the lack of foam (which we know really isn't necessary anyway, although it feels pretty nice!).. but with that also comes more massaging, which is a treat for your scalp anyway I guess!
The revelation that Eric and Niall had asked Terry to watch over Sookie before Sookie even got mixed up with vampires was a big surprise for me when I read Dead Reckoning. Now I want to know Eric and Niall’s history even more. Was this part of what made Eric so angry that the queen went behind his back and sent Bill after Sookie? Why is it that Niall is friendly with a vampire? I know Sookie’s not one for asking questions—but for my sake, I hope she does!
They shall teach no vain, and old wives opinions, no heresies, nor popish errors, disagreeing from the doctrine and faith of Christ: neither any thing at all, whereby the rude people may be stirred up to the desire of novelties, or contention. But they shall always teach that, which may make for edifying, and may unite the hearers in Christian peace and love.
Most of the Lucky Lab beers are aggressive, which suits the taste of Portlanders, who like their beers to have intense flavors. Dog Day IPA is an exceptional example of an India Pale Ale, a notoriously strong, hoppy style. On the other end of the spectrum, Black Lab Stout is so impenetrable with dark malts that, unless it’s been cask-conditioned, it is likely to overwhelm most drinkers. For a milder beer, try Stumptown Porter or Königs Kölsch.
Magnolia trees always inspire me. Why? Because grass doesn’t grow at the trunk base and it is a symbolic reminder to never let grass grow under our feet.
Friday early p.m.: truck is loaded, JP and I pick up kids and dog and head to our next home!
Shailene Woodley, The Descendants
Nude model Eileen Yumiko Yap has been in a state of distress since her nude photos were leaked online and circulated widely.
GEEKS GIRLS AND SECRET IDENTITIES is a big, sloppy, affectionate ode to the fringe kid. My editor said it is essentially about a boy who feels unlovable, incapable, and undeserving of acceptance and respect, but eventually realizes that he is eminently lovable, highly capable, and undoubtedly worthy of acceptance and respect. And if even one of my future readers walks away from my book with the tiniest scrap of belief that those feelings are attainable, well then – that would be significant, wouldn’t it?
Okay, so maybe it’s not like a fireball at all. Even if you can only pay 2-3 mana for each X, you’re still going to wipe most of the player’s creatures off of the board. White has Terminus, Black has Killing Wave, Blue has Devastation Tide, and Red has Bonfire of the Dead. Not sure what green has though . . but now every color has a board wipe!
Janet Hendricks, 48, New York, N.Y.
But she went away fast,
It’s easy to get bogged down in all the possibilities and in looking at our society, world, city, state, school and seeing places ripe for more compassion and change. Rather than getting overwhelmed, start small. Look to yourself – look to your interactions at home and your workplace.
Makes 3-4 servings
This category always elicits the widest, most fascinating range of choices. I gotta say, I look forward to seeing what everyone votes for in this category probably more than any other. What I didn't expect was that this would be also the closest category this year. Up until the end, it looked like a neck-and-neck tie.
Wynkoop Brewing Company McKenzie Milkstout
HI BUTTERFLIES!!!! -- how has everyone been doing? -- i'm hoping to get to about 2-3 blog posts a week - gotta work my way back into the groove - and with hardly ever being at home, and when i am i usually passed out, it's been tough to get on here and produce creative posts - my creative energy right now is focused on a LIFE changing venture *crossing fingers it works out*
At capturing and moving the levers of power, Norquist seems smarter to me than Romney.
1 tbsp roughly chopped rosemary
*Morgan Holly “disliked change and the idea of people having private lives.”
I’m a mama who stakes her claim in the “limited screen time” camp. No judging from me. I just grew up with the t.v. as my babysitter and I’m a bit neurotic because I help kids and families with their problems for a living so I have some pretty petty and stupid stuff I stress over. Once my tot hit two, he was allowed to watch the screen. On a 4 hour flight last summer at the age of 3? We busted out the lap top and introduced our car obsessed tot to your masterpiece CARS. He was sold. We were sold. Fast forward to many Friday night family movie nights with Monsters,Inc., Toy Story 1,2 and 3 and (my personal fav) Wall-E. My car obsessed tot became even more obsessed in the past year. Anything with wheels, really. So imagine our excitement and delight when we discovered that you were creating a CARS 2??? If you had told me pre-child I would get this damn excited over a kid’s movie? I would have laughed at you. But alas, CARS 2 was a BIG deal round here at the Casa C. The big day came and the tot invited his little 4 year old friends. 6 little tots all in a row with their CARS 2 popcorn/candy/drink packs….12 adults sitting in a row behind them waiting for all the excitement.
He got me with that one. It’s always difficult for me to choose. “Virginia Woolf,” I said.
Klaus Melchers - keyboards
Since I dispensed with short trousers, Lego and dreams of becoming a Formula 1 driver, I’ve always immersed myself in the book and magazine publishing world. When I put the Lego away and hung up my fantasy helmet—all l wanted to do was write and see my books published. It took many years to achieve that, filled with a lot of pretentions, false starts, elation and disillusion.
There was no sound, but the railing, it wrenched under my fists. It let itself mold to my tug, like some malleable plastic. I let go and stared at the bulge.
I introduced myself to the lady behind the counter and she told me that I should come back later as Cesare was working in his vineyards around Vernazza – another of the five towns. She also recommended a place for lunch, so I set off downhill to the waterside restaurant and nabbed the last table that faced the sea.
So apart from the CSS validation issues I’ve mentioned earlier, all is pretty right to go.
Johnston writes: “Which federal program took in more than it spent last year, added $95 billion to its surplus and lifted 20 million Americans of all ages out of poverty?”
On another ethical Issue we have been heavily encouraged by our tutors to think about our ethical professional practice. Will we accept work from everyone or can we afford to be ethical in the decisions that we make once we have left education?
Once they've put on the blindfold, you won't have to worry about mascara or eyeliner, but you'll still want to go out in a blaze of glory. Be bold, using a fiery, bright lipstick, such as Revlon's ColorBurst in Coral ($9) or Estée Lauder's Cherry Kiss ($20), then do matching gloss on top, like Dior Addict UltraGloss in Red Stockings ($27). If the blindfold leaves the brows visible, you'll want them full to balance out the daring lips. Brush them upward, pluck strays, then lightly fill them in with a brow pencil. Those guys in the firing squad won't forget you in a hurry!
Lunch in the 1950′s when I was a little child, was, for most working people, the main meal of the day. It would be two courses, during the week, a main meal and a dessert.
-getting sunburnt
As it stands on its own way out there.
2 eggs 1 cup sugar
“We run out of gas?”
The forbidden tattoo: words.
if you do not handle this right
So, all in all, good day.
Talk about lack of control, the exit to the garden shop is now smack in front of a wall of flat screen TVs. The merchandise experts obviously envision a John Everyman who comes to buy lawn fertilizer and instead ends up drooling in front of a 42” plasma screen. I hope he isn’t looking for a lawn chair as well. Logic would have put them near the lawn and garden dept., but those have been moved to the most remote corner of the store, about a block away.
The Christmas List ... ABC Family ... 7 AM
Columbia Public Schools voters elected one incumbent, elected one newcomer to the board and passed the tax levy and bond issue.
“We are confident, I say, and willing rather to be absent from the body, and to be present with the Lord.”
Lots of fun to be had!
While searching for Chaney, the reader learns a bit about the backgrounds of Cogburn and LaBoeuf. Cogburn is 40-ish and fought alongside Jesse and Frank James under Capt. Quantrill in the Civil War. Quantrill was known for the war crimes he committed against civilian populations, and it is hinted that Cogburn might have been involved in one of the worst at Lawrence, Kansas. His work history after the war involved a variety of trades and illicit activities. He became a Federal Marshal after an employer brought him up on charges in Reno. The Marshal there recognized Cogburn from their youth and got him a job. LaBoeuf, on the other hand, was too young to get involved in the war until the very end, missing out on any important action, much to his disappointment. LaBoeuf has a glorified view of the war and fighting, which is perhaps easier to have when you haven’t seen the fighting. He remarks that he nearly cried when he heard the war was over. He is disgusted by Cogburn’s past (riding with Quantrill) and by his current behavior — siding with Mattie against him and engaging in excessive drinking.
The book chronicles life in and around Paris through the experiences of several American ex-pats who chose to stay in the city after the Nazi's occupied the city in 1942. Some were purely courageous survivors, some key players in the resistance, some collaborators and some -- you just weren't too sure about.
Emily Hobhouse tells the story of the young Lizzie van Zyl who died in the Bloemfontein concentration camp: "She was a frail, weak little child in desperate need of good care. Yet, because her mother was one of the 'undesirables' due to the fact that her father neither surrendered nor betrayed his people, Lizzie was placed on the lowest rations and so perished with hunger that, after a month in the camp, she was transferred to the new small hospital. Here she was treated harshly. The English disposed doctor and his nurses did not understand her language and, as she could not speak English, labelled her an idiot although she was mentally fit and normal. One day she dejectedly started calling:
I kept seeing the cover for These Girls on a lot of blogs lately & I kept feeling like I had seen it before... just not with that title. I seem to have a nose for covers that are similar or utilize the same model/art. But it wasn't until I was thumbing through ARCs from last year that I wasn't able to get to that I realized I had a copy of You Have Seven Missed Messages thanks to RandomHouse. Lo & behold this gal with the red shirt was also on the cover.
Our flower baths were conducted first thing in the morning, with each of us receiving the bath individually at the hand of don Rober.
The gun community has offered me hope and strength, and courage.
4. BE CAREFUL NOT TO INCLUDE ANY SPOILERS
And into my garden stole
Nowadays, one can only stand and watch in astonishment how news and opinion is being manipulated in South Africa. The example I want to point out is the case of the new book being written by General Jannie Geldenhuys, former chief of the SA Defence Force (1985-1990).
28. Steven Spielberg nicknamed the mechanical shark in the movie Jaws, “Bruce.”
Last weekend I had the pleasure to meet Tom, the owner. He gave my friends a big hello - I didn't realize they were such regulars. Stage House has a lot of regulars. I asked him why they removed the lavender vinaigrette from the menu. The plants were destroyed when the patio was paved. I felt like I was trapped in the middle of a Joni Mitchell song, until I realized I really love the patio. So chalk it up to progress and business: my fresh herb inspired dressing was replaced with a ballsy new concept: all you can eat free bbq.
Did I just blow your mind? Ok, so that wasn't exactly groundbreaking news. The internet's ability to cause buzz and spread things like wild fire is not lost on advertisers. But, the internet is a fickle place and getting your product/client/brand talked about and spread around takes something special. Here is an example.
When I was home last August, I couldn’t help but notice all of the new bike lanes and bicyclists in the city. The friends I chatted with about it and I agreed: it’s so cool that Bloomberg and the City are making such efforts and that New York is getting more bike-friendly.
know I
The Ladies on the Top Table.......is that is 'top of the class' table? 'top gals table'? or the table at the top end of the room?.. or all three?......anyway, they are all busy beavering away for the Big Tree-mendous Quilt Show that is coming up in a rush, Winifred is creating a lovely cushion, appliqueing a pieced tumbling blocks to the cushion front. Louise is also creating a cushion, lots of lovely hand quilting going on there! and Dorothy is knitting up a storm with a squiggly scarf, lots of little 'fingers' down the side that will twist and turn as the scarf grows.
He woke up with a jolt, bolt upright in the bed, alone, too early, too quiet.
to have a conversation – “She talked about her busy day at the office for over one hour”
South Africa’s role as a non-permanent member of the UN Security Council has been mixed. In Cote d’Ivoire, for example, as forces loyal to former President Laurent Gbagbo were killing Ivorians known or suspected of supporting rival and current President Alassane Ouattara, South Africa chose to focus on the validity of the contested November 2010 elections, which it claimed were inconclusive. That foot-dragging stalled international and regional efforts to resolve the electoral crisis and protect civilians under siege.
that wherever you may go throughout your life, I will always be with you."
Protoss versus Zerg
After that I joined her for another 2X IPA then moved on to the Barley Wine known as Back Burner. With an ABV of 9.6% this is not a beer to take lightly. But it is GLORIOUS. I wanted to move on to a Phin & Matt’s but that was not available to me at that time so Jay twisted my arm and gave me another Back Burner. Ouch. I knew that if I had any chance at not regretting my night this morning that I needed some chicken wings.
I love RPGs and Survival Horrors, but I have a hard time finding good games in those genres nowadays. Some of my favourite games are: Fallout 1 & 3, Mass Effect 1 & 2, Bioshock, Resident Evil Remake and Resident Evil 4, Mortal Kombat: Armageddon, Goldeneye 64, Majora's Mask, Doom 64, Stubbs the Zombie, Penumbra: Black Plague, COD4, Halo 3 and Minecraft! I hate modern music. I think it sucks. I'm a Calvinist, and I believe anyone who puts their faith in God, not in man, will be happy and successful. Men are more crooked than a British person's teeth, so why should I believe anything they say? I'm currently writing a sci-fi novel, in a genre similar to 1984 and Brave New World. I can't match the writing quality of Orwell and Huxley, but my aim is to create a book that reminds people of those themes, with a modern twist. If you haven't already read 1984 and Brave New World, then I highly recommend you do. They are powerful books, that might even make you rethink your views on society and the world. Most people, because of my opinions and characteristics, think I am weird and creepy. These are the same people who smoke Jenkem and think "Ice is contracted water."
And of course, because I'm a writer and I can't seem to ever turn that switch off, I'm thinking about whether or not to write a book about fibroids now.
The Centre of Responsive Politics, a Washington think tank which tracks election spending, estimates that spending in the 2010 Congressional elections will total almost 4 billion. The five highest-spending Senate races were: Connecticut, $21 million. California $18 million; Nevada, where the Democratic Majority leader Harry Reid spent $17 million, and Arizona, where Republican John McCain spent $17 million. Senatorial candidates in Arkansas spent $12 million. California GOP senatorial nominee Carly Fiorina spent nearly $6 million out of her own pocket to bag the party nomination. That’s just for this election. The Centre for Public Integrity found that the Republican Senate leader, Mitch McConnell, has spent nearly $50 million over the past quarter century on campaigning. One political financial watchdog group flatly branded this obscene spending legalized corruption.
As we are born apart from this hole-stuffing something we have a particular discomfort from day one. Accompanying our first breaths and growing throughout our years is a subtle, softly nagging, disquietude which keeps us searching for relief. Following this line of thinking, then, and resultant of the hole we have an innate desire to take some remedy to ourselves to resolve the discomfort that we all, I believe, come to find within us; this hole that pleads with us to be filled; the spiritual void.
The reason I have a highly repetitive morning, pre-work ritual is so I can do it while still half asleep. The paranoid part of me (and a large part of me is routinely paranoid) is starting to suspect that vuvuzelas and exploding drinks are conspiring against me.
Forest of symbols
So what is it? Devine intervention? Coincidence? Luck?
Addressing diversity as a way to maintain equality, calls for versatility from a company. No document can foresee every scenario that may occur, but a good one can certainly lay the groundwork for future solutions to future issues. Acting as a guiding set of principles, a policy can combine itself into a company’s identity, as making a commitment to equality and diversity has come to be essential in staying competitive in today’s industry.
By Sunday I had Googled and read everything I could, planned routes, dates and decided I had to do it, don' t know why I just had to, I even ordered my guide book. The 8th Edition John Breirley pilgrim guide
The Problems with Premises 3 and 4: Zombie Physiology
This year, I am trying desperately to break the cycle. Mother's Day doesn't steal my joy. Satan does. He swoops in and pulls the rug right out from under me, reminding me of all that's been lost and making me yearn for and even envy those who celebrate without the sorrow and loss. He reminds me of how I fall short and am nothing to be celebrated myself. The thing is...he can only do that if I let him. If I focus my eyes upward, I see a God who is MIGHTY to save. I see a God who has held my quivering grief filled body through each and every loss. I see a God who has shown me comfort that I would never have known otherwise. I see a God who has never left, who has wiped each tear and picked me up and led me onward.
We have here the makings of a naval clash that Georgia, given Russian air, naval and land forces in the eastern Black Sea, will lose. What is Saakashvili up to? He seems intent on provoking a new crisis to force NATO to stand with him and bring the United States in on his side - against Russia. Ultimate goal: Return the issue of his lost provinces of Abkhazia and South Ossetia back onto the world's front burner.
The Frontier Constabulary is used to police the regions bordering Pakistan's tribal areas.
This tale explains why I am now working on my 3rd production. This small village group played such a huge part in my recovery. I have to keep doing it. I still have my problems but this annual challenge, this chance to be someone else; it just helps me so much.
Welcome to a new challenge at Crafty Ann's. We had some fabulous entries for #29 and thoroughly enjoyed coming to see them all, thank you for sharing them with us.
There are video cameras everywhere,
Lend me your ear and give me a moment to explain.
In a bowl whisk together the dry ingredients. Using a pastry cutter or two knives, cut the butter and shortening into the flour until it resembles a coarse meal. Refrigerate the mixture for 30 minutes. Remove from the refrigerator and pour the buttermilk into the bowl. Using a spatula, gently stir together , until it begin to form a dough. Turn out onto a lightly floured surface and knead ever so slightly so that the dough holds together. Pat the dough into a 6 inch square and cut into nine pieces. Pick up each pieces and lightly shape into a round and place into prepared dish. Flatten biscuits slightly and bake for 12 minutes or until baked through and golden.
The phrase "colorant selection mechanism" is presumptively not subject to 112 ¶ 6 because it does not contain the term "means." CCS Fitness, Inc. v. Brunswick Corp., 288 F.3d 1359, 1369 (Fed. Cir. 2002). However, a limitation lacking the term "means" may overcome the presumption against means-plus-function treatment if it is shown that "the claim term fails to ‘recite sufficiently definite structure’ or else recites ‘function without reciting sufficient structure for performing that function.’" Id. (quoting Watts v. XL Sys., Inc., 232 F.3d 877,
Happy Friday everyone!
I really, really want to briefly tell another story about the time before improv class on Tuesday; I was speculative yesterday about whether or not to take advantage of a few freebies through Tax Day, yet I accept my societal role as a consumerist whore, and want nothing more than to put out, especially after I found more deals in this article.
Apparently, even Bo Diddley was a fan: he's reported to have invited The Dishrags down to his Miami home for "some recordin' and some partyin'." However, the girls never took up ol' Ellas Bates on his offer, so we may never know how the Dishrags may have sounded with that Bo Diddley beat.
Then how do we respond to these tests? Do we continue to believe, or doubt? do we stay faithful to God, or turn away? Do we think of God as our helper who sustains us in our trials, or the enemy who puts us there? Do we stand firm or collapse, waffle or stay the course? do we recognize and accept divine care and the assistance we receive from others, or do we only notice our shock and disappointment, and focus only on our personal hardship and suffering?”
Honestly, my heart goes out to Sobby, it really does. But if a movie is making you sniffle and moan that loudly in public, maybe you should stick to reality.
Verse 3:
Raquel Zimmerman for Louis Vuitton.
finding all that’s ours
And therein lies the real story and a very sad one at that. Beyond that divide lies the politics evoked by the incident that included the President of the United States saying, “If I had a son he would look like Trayvon.” This is the second time the President has inserted himself in a story of the arrest of a black American. Presidents are not supposed to do this, especially if they are trained lawyers and alleged experts on the Constitution. It instantly politicized the case.
The campaign of vilification which lasted for eighteen months and had been featured in media all across the world, culminated in a time bomb being planted outside Peter Griffith’s home. The bomb was a battery and clock placed on a meter cover, connected by wires through the letterbox to a detonator and an explosive substance. The explosion splintered part of the front door, blew the dining room door off its hinges, broke the hinges on an upstairs door, blew off the loft entrance, smashed some windows and drove splinters into the walls and stair banisters in the hall. The police thought it the work of experts. The media created a climate in which Peter Griffiths was made a legitimate target for political fanatics. This shows that irresponsible journalists and politicians set up people for attack if they disagree with them and put people’s lives in danger especially now we have many Muslim extremists in the country, if they use wild and emotive terms of abuse based on lies.
Stamp Sets: Favorite Things
A few weeks earlier Yvonne designed a party for some fabulous event. When she arrived to set-up, she discovered that the previous event planner had left behind 50+ glasses, and she could take them. So she came up with a way to turn them into something fa-la-la-fabulous, and showed us how she did it.
The police find Vi beaten to death in an alley the day after she slammed a door in Delia’s face and told her that she didn’t want to see her again. As Vi’s emergency contact, Delia must identify the body. Haunted by the image of her dead friend and guilty that their first big fight was their last conversation, Delia makes it her mission to assist the police with their investigation. Until she discovers that the detective in charge of the case was being investigated by Vi herself for planting evidence in a capital murder trial. Suddenly, the detective’s disturbing lack of interest in finding out who killed Vi makes sense.
Well, around 4.3 miles in, my knee decided it had had enough, and that oh-so-slight ache started up. I stopped, stretched, walked a little, and tried to run some more. This usually gets a little more distance out of it before it gets worse, and before I knew it I was at 5 miles but with a lot more discomfort. I almost walked off course to call a friend to come pick me up, but thought if I rested enough I might make it. I conceded to walking the rest of the distance, rested when necessary, and hobbled across the finish line at 76 minutes and some change.
With all the hype I have been hearing lately about cutting the whopping 2% that NPR gets from the Federal government, along with the TON of money they get with their “beg-a-thons,” I thought I would add some much needed perspective and a sense of history. National Public Radio was started to ensure journalistic integrity, so that there would be a source of news that could not be purchased by corporations and thus biased for a political agenda. If we lived in a hyper-liberal society, NPR would offer a conservative perspective. The country we live in now is so conservative that the Nixon years (Affirmative Action and the EPA started in the Nixon Administration) look downright leftist; consequently, NPR is acting responsibly by offering a slightly more liberal perspective (some would argue moderate and not liberal).
Scotch Salmon Cream.
The full diagnosis on admission to the asylum listed dementia praecox, more commonly known as schizophrenia, as the main cause of his mental instability. We may not know for sure but it is not difficult to imagine what Bolden’s life may have looked like once confined to the institution. Ken Kesey‘s One Flew Over Cuckoo’s Nest was written less than 20 years after Buddy’s death and is set in a similar asylum in Oregon.
Sukarno’s governing style was “Guided Democracy”.
Cravings can be a mom’s daily devotional, a supplement to her regular quiet time, or even doubled up during the day. The set of 40 cards offers over a month’s worth of Cravings in whatever way serves the spiritual needs of individual moms.
January 5, 2012 ~ Mailed out I-800A form to the adoption agency via certified mail (form that goes to homeland security along with our homestudy report that the social worker does to get clearance from the United States to adopt) This will take 3 months to get back so the waiting game begins!! I am praying that somehow it ends up on someone's desk that is super quick and it won't take that long. All of our stuff can not go to China until we get this clearance. ugh!
1) Those that solely use Aikido as a vehicle to a deeper understanding of movement and practice the techniques understanding that.
Given these flawed assumptions behind punishment as the "price" for misbehavior, it's little wonder that higher "prices" don't generate the best results in terms of reducing crime. In fact, though crime has been declining nationally in recent years, that trend appears to be disconnected with incarceration rates, or even inversely related.
I reveled in catch-up scenes, gawked at the brand new hairstyles, and even attempted to comfort Ichigo through the reflective glass surface of my television screen.
So, as I head into 30, I decided there’s some ish I need to leave behind.
Taped by: JME
Photo of a Polish Political Prisoner patch which was worn in concentration camps to indicate the prisoner's status from warrelics.eu from the Polish Forced Labor Collection forum posted by 4thskorpion
CLB will be giving this KJV audio MP3 as a gift to all who buy a KJV Bible or order our in-house titles during this month.
06 Physical Sex
There are tremendous spiritual opportunities today working in the background, much like how a computer has its operating systems working in the background while we use the applications as tools for our lives.
Because of anti-Japanese sentiment during the war, the sign was changed to read Chinese Tea Garden, and for historical preservation, it was left that way.
6:30am: Putting Pants on Philip
* He gives a really garbled interpretation of what the Emancipation Proclamation accomplished, followed by that Lincoln quote that neo-Confederates like to throw around because, removed from context, it makes Lincoln sound like a political opportunist who didn't care about slavery.
Politicians, religions, schools, the anti gun crowd, you name it. They want to bring you for what you can give them, which is often nothing more than a feeling of power and self worth for the leaders of the group.
However, I am interested in something else which seems more self evident than the glass ceiling:
it’s the response of the human spirit to the Word of God.
1:00 Kissing Contest, Peanut Butter Lick contest, Hot Dog Dunk, Costume Contest
I think I signed up for the challenge while only partly conscious, or maybe I was sleep-surfing-the-net that day. Who knows. The thing is, I signed up for the A to Z Blogging Challenge coming up this April and going on all month long, the goal being to blog EVERYDAY (except Sundays) with the alphabet letters as blog post prompt.
Check that you have all the roasting and serving dishes that you need. Borrow what you don't have if necessary. Many stores sell disposable roasting trays for turkeys this time of year that work perfectly well.
The grandmother of Alice and Ruth, Marietta Chamberlain Woodworth:
As I ran I noticed my pace was getting slightly quicker and by 4 miles in I was at a comfortable steady pace (8:20 – 8:30). At two miles I ran through Pollock Park and Stanley (the squirrel) popped by to say hello. It was the only time I saw him on the run, but it was nice of him to say hello. ;-)
and she is all set to relax and enjoy all the delights
Apparently his holiness, after being criticised for suggesting that the use of condoms could endanger public health and increase the spread of AIDS (which appears to go against the usual medical advice), decided that being Pope wasn’t quite enough to keep him busy and that he would go on Stars in your Eyes and be King Canute for the day by calling for Africa to stop being corrupt – an equally pointless call to arms for those of a dictatorial and presidential disposition in this beautiful but troubled continent.
Yesterday I unintentionally appeared at an employment cattle call. When answering ads, I try my best to avoid employment agencies, but sometimes it can't be helped. Sometimes good comes out of it. But nothing good can come out of an employment cattle call.
SM: One take away for me is that I got in touch with an agent thanks to my having attended this show and this has been very productive so far. I hear this from lots of people, btw. Agents and editors who say they're not open to submissions will often make an exception for conference attendees.
I was closing up shop at 12:00, and I wasn't stupid.
I contacted Diane through a Craigslist ad for her wreaths because they looked like just what I was looking for at a great price. Through various correspondence, Diane agreed to come and decorate our home with fresh greens in exchange for a review. Let me tell you right off the bat, she is fantastic and I truly love what she did in our home.
After all we all just want to be loved and feel like we are good at something. All too often it is the desire to 'fit in' that is what makes children give up what they believe in. Peer pressure is strong. So sad isn't it.......
- Coach Scott announced Kyrie was going to be starting earlier in the afternoon, and I was excited to hear that, as this was really the impetus for wanting to go and see his first game as a Cavalier. Defensively, he looked up to the task and his quick hands almost cost Jose Calderon of the Raptors a couple turnovers. He had only one turnover, which is great for your first NBA game. Now, shooting-wise, he couldn't buy a basket, but he didn't look afraid of shooting the ball, and I think that confidence will help him as the season goes on.
Every promise I made,
Pain is a funny thing.
Now, I'm not saying you should from thence, or perhaps be contractors.
Some of you may know that I write Bible study curriculum. One of the studies I have written is on 1 John. Each lesson in the study is prefaced with an Introduction. The following is excerpted from this study. It seems fitting to post this today in honor of Kyle.
Computer software known as Linguistic Inquiry and Word Count (LIWC) analyzes written content, derived from the statement analysis approach, and looks for three markers: fewer first-person pronouns, more words that convey negative emotion, and fewer exclusionary words (except, but). The software has been more effective than human judges, but the accuracy rate is still only about 67 percent.
Bake at 350 for 30 minutes
There was already very good reason to think that there was a good-sized untapped UK market for a quality offering of this kind, but it was impossible to know for sure until they turned up. I'm so grateful to Andreas and Lynn for taking the risk and making it happen. There will certainly be some who could have taken or left it, but I thought it was brilliant. If those who didn't find it quite their thing give up their future places to those who do, then it'll only get better. The plan is to repeat this next year, and possibly to organise a smaller event between now and then - check the website for details. It was full up, they had as many bookings as the rooms' regulations allowed. But it's only once a year, and it's two miles from Totnes. So I think other organisers who truly want to deliver a quality-focused event, could take a lot of encouragement from this success.
i search the print
The portion of U.S. electricity fired by coal has slipped from about 50 percent to 45 percent in the last few years as hydraulic fracturing, or fracking, and other drilling techniques have allowed access to vast new U.S. natural gas supplies.
So I returned from my American adventures early this week. It all went far to quickly and we had a fantastic time. Here is one of my favourite pictures from our holiday, taken in Yosemite National Park. The views are just stunning! There might be a few more pictures coming up once i have had a chance to go through them all...i think i took over 1500 in total from the whole holiday, which my boyfriend finds hilarious. My thinking is though, the more pictures i take the better the chances that i will get some awesome ones :)
This was sent to me by a friend. I am posting it on their behalf.
This little girl became paralyzed after being injected by vaccines.
1 cup fat free sour cream
We’ve recently revamped our class policies and instructor contracts and we’re looking to add to our class roster for the fall. Our shop specializes in beginner and intermediate level classes in a wide variety of craft skills. Potential instructors must have at least 5 years experience with their craft medium and some teaching/training experience.
Officers had to be ambulance a few weeks back to take an initial s136 Mental Health patient who had been assessed at the local hospital, who had no beds, so 150 miles return, two officers on overtime, because ambulance ‘wouldn’t touch it’. It’s okay- we’ll do it.
Buy books at your local bookstore. They are a business, after all, and it needs to make business sense for them to open their facility to you (for free). Frequenting the store will develop good will toward that end. And, really, you should be reading anyway.
Women are often praised in society when they have found their dream man, but when they still have yet to find their ” Knight in Shining Armor,” they are told that God will one day place a man in their lives as if the sole purpose of their lives is to get married. But what does God’s plan for women look like when there is no husband to help, a home to use for serving others, and children to raise?
And talking of "eye candy", that brings us nicely on to the "walk on" girls - and I really don't remember them being there in the days of Leighton Rees and Bobby George, am I right? When did they first appear... anyway, the walk on girls are the always-very-pretty young women who accompany the players as they "walk on" to the oche, making sure the blokes have something to look at while us women just wish we had their legs! (The walk on girls' that is, not the darts players... God forbid!) They're a part of darts culture now, as is the walk on itself, and I've seen some classics in my time! From Andy (The Pieman) smith handing out pies, to Paul Nicholson's dark glasses and scowl, to Simon Whitlock's 'Wizard of Oz,' it's a fascinating part of the game, and shows the sport's tongue-in-cheek humour and ability to sometimes not take itself too seriosuly. And that's what I hope I've managed to capture in Too Much Trouble in Paradise, I really do. I hope I've managed to do the darts-related scenes justice, bring in some humour, but also showcase what a wonderful sport it is.
—Meaning
Well, Bella was convinced it was anyway. The miracle part Dan couldn’t deny, given the grim prognosis for future progeny handed to them by every one of the top specialists they’d seen. And he supposed it was a Christmas miracle, considering that was when they’d found out about the little guy.
* Something weighing heavily on my mind these days......how do I teach my son to be a giving, thoughtful, caring person. He is a sweet, kind boy. But, of course, still has his selfish moments....How do I teach him about God and all that He does and is. How do you do it? I feel overwhelmed and not sure where to start. I hope some of it is by example...I am trying. Maybe he is just too young yet to understand it all....
One interesting thing about the gospel of John is that there is no genealogy. But John stresses the divinity of Christ; since Christ is God, there is no genealogy, for God has always existed. I just got goosebumps while typing that because I cannot wrap my head around something/someone always existing. I just can’t fathom that. Can you? Eternity doesn’t fit in my brain. Oddly, I don’t have a lot of trouble thinking about eternity forward. It’s eternity backward that boggles me.
The second component of "what we do" is submitting our work to the directors, producers and our peers, and working with them as we hone our work, improve it and alter it to fit appropriately within the larger scheme of the project.
For wives, this means submit to your husbands as to the Lord. For a husband is the head of his wife as Christ is the head of the church. He is the Savior of his body, the church. As the church submits to Christ, so you wives should submit to your husbands in everything (Ephesians 5:22-24).
Close look of the peony.
Then there are the TV listings. A brief synopsis of each programme is elegantly written giving you the facts, and leaving plenty to your imagination. My mind soars over the possibilities left to chance when I read that on Tuesday there’s a mysteriously intriguing programme named “Coppers”. What could it be about? Perhaps it’s about the fall of the Mayan empire. Maybe it is an insightful documentary on molecular physics. Who knows?
Makes me paranoid about where my life is going actually. I still don't have a job, and to be honest gotten lazy with sending applications out. I could be doing things for myself that I'm not. I been mainly focusing on video games instead which is just silly, but easier than dealing with my problems. :X Also funny thing, I been working on getting more traffic for my blog but not posting as much as I would like to. Kind of defeats the purpose, heh.
3-1 Ali Ingram, (low accurate shot from twenty-five yards into goalie's bottom right-hand corner).
Never to Paynims may I show love or peace.
I'm beginning to think -- after reading books like Linchpin, as well as books by Daniel Quinn, mentioned above, who also writes about the significance of how we make our living -- that, at least in American culture, where work has always been the main driver for cultural change, the radical altering in how we work -- and how we think about work -- will be the driving force in changing the way we think about education -- and, ultimately, in changing the way we choose to live and learn.
And I really love taking pictures of the awe of the kids looking at the animals.
The Wall Street Journal editorial of January 4, 1995 stated: “It was Mr. Gorbachev, recall, who in January 1990 chose to defend his use of violence against the independence-seeking Azerbaijan on the grounds that the people of this then-Soviet republic were heavily armed gangs of hooligans and drug-traffickers who were destabilizing the country and quite possibly receiving support from foreign governments.”
where I can find a beginning of an explanation: anthropology, the
Contacts:
That’s just one of the things that didn’t make the cut for my “Commandments for Working Out” article. It’s a great read for everyone who needs the basics. Even I have to remind myself of these from time to time (and I’ve been doing this for the better part of a decade).
The second graph shows the same three indexes in real terms (adjusted for inflation using CPI less Shelter). Note: some people use other inflation measures to adjust for real prices.
And this one, which is apparently quoted everywhere I haven’t been looking:
And I seriously hit rock bottom during that season. The exfoliating was overtaken by intoxicating. A whole lot of intoxicating.
I asked Dave, an employee at Southside Virginia Community College, if he had heard of any Muslim groups in the area.
Which I guess mean that 70% don't think pubs are "much more pleasant" since the smoking ban. So it's no surprise then that a dozen pubs close each week, is it!
One area I wasn't really that organized in, ironically, was my blog. There were some nights I would stare at my computer screen as I was getting ready to post and not have a clue what I was going to write about. I would "wing it" and hope that a reader might be happy with it and come back the next day. Yep, that's how I rolled.
We were having a blast and made a great team. Nothing could stop us. After a while of cruising around and making some wicked sweet turns, we decided to try and tip the boat, just for fun. Amy had sailed before, but I never had. I am always down for trying new things, so I agreed that we should try to tip. We turned hard and it seemed like we were going to tip, but we didn’t. Second time, we were basically standing upright, but we still didn’t tip. Finally, on the third time, we gave it all we had and jumped out of the boat as it went down.
I have to discharge myself. I am wheeled down to the discharge lounge hooked up to a catheter, looking like death warmed up (slightly) and I sit there hoping hoping hoping that the private hospital will take me in their arms and just diagnose me.
Every year I make a “resolution” at the Jewish New Year. Not a fluffy one like people often make on January 1 that is forgotten just a few weeks in – but something that will hopefully make me a better Jew.
“You feel it in your bones,” I said, unhelpfully, while munching on a Snickers.
We had some awesome reminders this year that God has woven in the story of adoption in Jesus' life, for all mankind, and for Butch and I as a family that makes us stop and wonder.
Two union leaders--beefy guys hardly afraid of confrontation--bluntly looked to assign blame. Gary La Barbera, president of the New York Central Labor Council (right), suggested, “When labor and community comes together, there’s nothing we can’t do,” adding, “Together, we can defeat any of our opposition.”
I also needed to check the Gaelic words and phrases that I used, but I had a get-out clause there as well – Gaelic can be mighty hard to pronounce and it’s full of silent letters, so I let my Sithe have their own simplified version of some words. They do live in a different world, after all... For the same reason I felt able to let my characters speak in occasional anachronisms – Seth is narrating the story from the present day, and he’s doing it in translation, so I felt the story ran smoother if I gave him free rein. He uses a lot of colloquialisms, too.
Both films have a brief “FPS shot.” In The Terminator, it’s right before Arnold bursts into the motel room Sarah and Kyle shared. In Terminator 2, it’s in the steel mill when Arnold faces the T-1000 (who attacks right after the said shot).
So, here I sit just before Christmas, worried about my daughter and grandchildren. I have a freezer full of food and feel really bad my daughter has nothing. She needs to get out of that situation. She'll read this and maybe get angry with me. Duane told me I should blog what is going on.
No ice cream?
castles and apples on boxes and stools
Nothing, like something, happens anywhere.
(what's the one thing you are going to make happen, weather permitting and all?
It is my sincere hope and prayer that my own ruminations along these lines may be of some benefit to others, and both edifying and educational.
Duration 3:57 Minutes
Have a super duper weekend!
Luckily Snyder breaks form in the last third of the book with three narrative stories in this universe.
I could call us eclectic tidal lifelong learners, but eclectic home schoolers is easier. I'm not a Natural Learning or Unschooling purist, but it is an important part of the big picture of learning for us. Here are some WONDERFUL articles about N.L. and U.S. on blogs I read regularly and find inspiring:
I look forward to taking my young daughter fishing again. We are lucky to live in an area where there is so many places to throw your bait - Louisiana is truly the Sportsman’s Paradise. With the introduction of our LA-31, which really compliments fried fish and French fries, we hope to make it a Beer Drinkers’ Paradise as well.
To give it a try, all I did was buy a large bag of mini marshmallows and a medium sized bag of spaghetti noodles. Actually, when I was at the grocery store, I was afraid that I would run out, so I bought two bags of marshmallows. It turned out that one large bag of marshmallows and the smallest available bag of spaghetti noodles would have been plenty for 24 children. I also let the kids eat five mini marshmallows each, in addition to creating their structures, and we still didn’t quite use up all of them! So I decided that we could do the project twice, and we STILL didn't use up all of the noodles!
occasion he was given a catalog of items to choose a
There are two such towers in Yazd. The bodies used to be laid in the cavity in the middle of the platform. The towers are no longer in use.
There are only three eateries in NB, and we decided to stay with Bruno.
Earflap
-why Austin might be the coolest and most creative city in America
Another few weeks goes by and it gets increasingly awkward, so I finally ask him in my most casual voice what is going on. I get the story from him that he doesn't know, feels bad, wants to work it out, blah, blah, blah and I suggest that if there's anything going on with the FB girl then he should explore it, I don't want to hold him back. He said that he had no desire to and that's when I said what I didn't mean, and nobody wants to hear. I said "Well, I can go either way." Silence on the other end.
* University of Leuven (Belgium)
STO: How did you get your band name?
But seriously, how do you know?
All well and good, right? Well, it was all well and good until the Boston Brewing Company, owners of Sam Adams Beer, got wind of it. After hearing that the domain names had been purchased, they knee-jerked a reaction and fired off a cease-and-desist letter as fast as can be. If Mark and Dave don't give up the domain names by October 29, something ominous will apparently occur.
We recently discovered another amazing place for riding bikes - bottlelake forest
“He is so gentle and takes food directly from our hands. He followed us all through the town. We are also so worried about the dogs in Avsallar at the moment because there are many that I have not seen since my last visit who used to be around each day. As I previously posted today, we have heard that the street animals are being poisoned again and don’t know how much longer they will survive on the streets.” - Sara
I have used the new release Fancy That Dies filmstrip, build a bloom and the scallop floret. I've torn the filmstrip in half again and used only half of the build a bloom to replicate the poppies in the photos.
Egg white mask
Made in China is staggering, an album that deserves all the acclaim it gets and more. Kyshera may not want to or do conform but there is no escaping the mass uniform of adulation that will surely come their way with the album.
In Miami, I am speaking English and looking forward to my own bed in an enclosed home with air conditioning. I think about my students back in Spain and how they used to flip over photos of our houses and gardens. I think about the hot shower waiting for me, and the undrinkable water in the city I’ve just left. I think a lot. And I’m still thinking.
I got them home and thought how unprepossessing they looked, and how on earth was I supposed to cook them?
The other pan is one box creme de leite (200g) + 5 Tbs unsweetened chocolate powder + some more cinnamon. This is also heated up for awhile.
and the microfiche pane.
Don’t know what I would do without him. He helps fight off the loneliness especially in my first few months at post. He’s always making me laugh with his crazy antics from eating stinging ants to sleeping in my latrine when I’m gone. I love coming home from a trip to Atapkame and getting off that moto and having him practically jump into my arms.
Thank you, Rowan, for stopping in, and congrats, Kirsten, on the release!
Dr. Gordon said it would be important to continue the studies, and to try to find out whether environmental chemicals were having an effect.
“I cannot stay,” Christopher said quickly, thinking of his empty pockets and of his urgent errand. “Pray you, is this the road to Harrington Manor?”
My generation is really bad with money and planning for their future. What if, I further my education and dedicate myself to teaching people how to take financial responsibility in these hard times? Our parents generations taught us to take money for granted. Often times we’ve been coddled, and cling to the familiar.
ADMINISTRATION
The minimum wage for workers under the age of 25 has been cut by 32 per cent.
Look for Athens brand phyllo twin packs (two 8-ounce packs in one box). The phyllo sheets are the perfect size for this dish. The components can be made a day ahead and refrigerated. Wait to assemble the baklava until you're ready to bake it.
The idea has flittered around my brain for a while. I always wanted to do something where the MC wasn’t exactly a good-guy, but wasn’t the bad-guy either. Someone who occupied that gray space between the two, who was willing to go somewhere most won’t. Nate was that character. The story sort of came over the period of a few years as his character developed.
These photos were taken right up the street from our hotel in Paris, on steps of the Odeon Theater.
The petrol station can tell you everything you need to know about modern life; everyone except for me (and a small handful of others), is a moron. Waiting for a pump to become available is positively painful and I have no idea, apart from my the world is full of idiots theory, why this should be.
The only thing in this entire universe that isn’t “racist” to a liberal is Marxism.
before trains and trams take them
H - I thought is made the art more festive, personally. You hadn't put anything Christmas-y in it.
MCA president Datuk Seri Dr Chua Soi Lek, who described the current political scenario as totally different from the past, said there should be a sense of “crisis feeling” in the party to take on this challenge.
And now, for those of you still reading, a quick question on naps. Izzy is way too old to still be taking 3 naps, but since she was not sleeping well at night, we have just gone with it. Now that her night sleep is getting better (typically 11 hours) her naps are a mess. She still wants to take her 3 naps as she gets tired at the "set" time, but then only sleeps for 30 minutes. When she wakes up she is not really rested but we cant get her back to sleep. Anyone experience this? Should we be helping her consolidate or just let it happen on its own? Help!
I plan on writing about the trip in Seam Reap in the next several posts. I have some places I would like to recommend to my friends and readers if they go to Seam Reap.
Long ago --back in 1962-63 my first year of Allegheny college I was really looking forward to being away from home. The Campus was coed but we lived in an all girls dorm, South Hall and had room mates assigned by the college. My roommate, Janet was also from the Pittsburgh area and we were similar but different, as outgoing and busy as I was she was more cautious and serious. I was a Spanish major and she French. I was experiencing the world around me and she was intent on studying and frequently reminded me that was our purpose. I'd burn the midnight oil and she was an early to bed and rise. She would dutifully hike to town even in the snow to Catholic mass while I announced that I could do just as well at the college chapel, which happened to be Methodist. This really gave Janet fits, "but we are Catholic, that's another reason they put us together..." Well, it was the start of my questioning many things, religion and faith among them. It was the 60's I would do many strange things, stretching my wings. Allegheny was a top notch recognized Eastern college with vast curriculum emphasizing Liberal Arts, Foreign Languages and pre-Medical. It was a big new world for me, first time away from home. ﻿﻿
I mean, it's gross and stinky and sometimes fills up an entire diaper so that wrapped up it's like a soft, odorous bomb. Along with this, there's the obligatory struggling of a baby anxious to be moving around. And getting away from the cold wet cloth on their tender little bum.
just enough water to cover cashews
George's solo is a neat little package, much akin to his solo on "I Saw Her Standing There" but with a greater blues feel. Or is that rockabilly? At the speed that "Boys" is played it all comes to one in the end.
I have been dealt some fucked up cards in the past half of a year and they are taking their toll on my health as far as weight loss and physical progression goes, the scale says so and my nonchalant attitude towards planning my intake for the days agrees. In addition to those cards there is a new and wonderful little girl in my life which is taking up much of my time as a stay at home dad. This makes working out as I should harder than it has been since starting down this road and I am finding it hard to work around that. I make no excuses for my lack of attention to my health plan that has worked for me up to this point but I can admit that I am having a hard time finding the strength to execute as the plan requires me to do in order for it to be a success.
The game tying goal came at 16:30 from Erik Christensen who was demoted to the fourth line due to his inconsistent play. He took an odd angle shot from just before the left side red line. The unsecured puck trickled in past OTT goalie-Elliot and after a review, the score was tied 3-3 in the third period. The shot was a nice break for the Rangers but it was a smart move to just put the shot on goal when no other play presented itself. Coaches always say - Put the puck on net from any angle. This goal was an example why.
gait to the podium. Without a note or written paper of any kind he placed both hands on the pulpit to steady himself and then quietly and slowly he began to speak....
This video is something I return to again and again if I feel the need for an energy boost. It never fails me and I’d defy anyone to watch it and not smile at some point during it… So it got me thinking… What is it about it that is so attractive?..
The comments indicated that Boehner plans to force action on his plan to provide only a temporary borrowing boost of about $1 trillion accompanied by spending cuts of at least as much, tying the remainder of the debt-ceiling increase Obama has requested to further cuts in the future. The White House says Obama would veto such a measure…. – Bloomberg, 7-24-11
Practically speaking, the French are more likely to associate the name of St. Sylvestre with oysters and champagne than any church doctrine. As you can see, both are being offered on tonight's menu at this mid-priced Parisian restaurant. Neither will be on my table tonight and my guess is that we will be in bed before 10. And that suits me just fine. For those of you with more ambitious plans, enjoy and be safe.
The problem with young people today is that they sleep too much.
It is in our nature to stay in our comfort zone where is it safe and predictable. So if we fall below the lower end of our comfort zone we scramble to get back into it. For example, if you are used to earning $500 a week and an unexpected bill comes in meaning you have to pay $100 more than you are used to. Because you are now outside of your comfort zone, you will feel unsafe and will flounder until you get back into your comfort zone (i.e. next pay day).
Today is the 20Th April so I will close entries on the 20Th May'.
Or maybe you remember a book that hooked you on a genre or type of story you’ve never read before. You enjoyed it so much you decided to read everything written by that author or maybe you even explored more books in that genre.
Blueseed wants to see if it can change situations like Sam’s father. Blueseed aims to be a visa-free start-up incubator. The start-up plans to have a ship 12 miles off of Half Moon Bay, California to host entrepreneurs from all over the world.
Who knows what the reality of it will all be, whether the promised Mayberry will turn into a purgatory, measured with a testing of ones metal and acumen, or instead far exceed all expectations and truly be the eddy in the stream. Days turn into weeks, weeks into months, time effectively spinning quickly away. The opportunity though, is the pace, space, and cadence that can be offered. If all goes as planned, fireflies will once again be viewed rising from the grasses in the early July heat, dancing for a moment in light, before falling from view to the wet earth below. S by my side will begin to see the world that I tried to describe, not like Mayberry, but of ancestral spaces, filled with twangs of speech, and summer rains that choke the air with thick humidity, cicada songs disturbing the nights darkness.
Circles of motion.
There’s one round here that’s worth a look,
The heart mind will work more effectively at once. This allows each
Take better care of skin. Did good. Only went to bed twice the whole year without washing my face. This year, have already purchased ProX to minimize my crazy forehead wrinkles. Will let you know if I see any difference.
PRESIDENT KARZAI: (Interpretation begins in progress) — prosperity and peace for the people of Afghanistan.
Anne DeMelle
10- WE GET THE BEST SONGS WRITTEN FOR US:
Beasts of Chaos
Whereas the Chinese Financials, CHIX, suffered credit deleveraging from falling copper and simply the mild onset of credit tightening, the US Banks, KRE, and Investment Bankers, KCE, suffered credit deleveraging from awareness that a default union had formed in Europe, VGK, and from awareness that the end of the investment age and the end of the floating currency age, has arrived. The turn lower in Leveraged buyouts, PSP, Junk Bonds, JNK, High Dividend Income, ABCS, and subprime automobile lender, NICK, reflects the beginning of the end of credit. The sharp downturn in Financials, XLF, has deleveraged the US Small Caps, IWM, which are critically dependent upon credit for financing of payroll, replenishing inventory, and restocking inventory.
To say that the guide is incomplete — while true — misses the larger point: the book’s value is marginal at best. Missing punctuation, inconsistent layout, and phantom words that appear as if vestiges of earlier versions of the same sentence collude to make it seem as if the manuscript had not been proofread.
It's a really super read, with lots of interesting recipes, and is now in my house in Brittany.
I've got a number of events booked up for Wasted, in Glasgow, Dundee, Fortrose, Manchester, Derby and elsewhere. Happy to take another booking or two in November and a couple each in January, February and March. See the events page of my author website.
Adventure Ecology was founded David de Rothschild and promotes respect and responsibility for the Planet, its environment, species and peoples by developing a greater connection with nature and an understanding of the Planet's greatest challenge: Climate Change. What better place to highlight the potential devastating effect of climate change than Second Life, a virtual world.
Petrol runs out and everybody goes to war, leaving the survivors to eat dog food in the Australian desert.
Winter is making me want dessert. I don't know how it does that. Its all cold (yes yes I think 19 degrees is cold) and I want to just go to bed early and get up late and eat lots of food.
So she took care of me today. No miraculous healing was performed, no five course meal was prepared, no super human chore list was crossed off. Instead, she just let me be, she let me rest, comfortable, safe, content knowing she was there for me. She did what she needed to take care of the grandchildren she loves, and she kept the day as stress free as possible so I could step up to be the best mom I could be to those grandchildren she loves. And she just quietly loved me. Thanks, Mom.
“Making sure that businesses can get the money they need to grow. This matters To Me, To Labour, To Britain.
- Maria
The dull flesh, which conceals your laughter
Tanden: Romney will be the least popular
Sgt. Gary Stein, 26, sued in federal court Tuesday to stop Thursday’s proceedings, arguing his right to free speech had been violated. But U.S. District Court Judge Marilyn Huff denied Stein’s request for an injunction, paving the way for a military panel to meet at Camp Pendleton today to decide Stein’s future in the Marine Corps.
excited about A Stone for Amer. Several of the characters from Delicate Armor take the lead in this next fictionalized story, some of which serves as an important thread in the novel. It is based on my father’s experience as a teenager in the early part of the twentieth century, when he and my grandfather traveled by train from Southwestern Minnesota to Eastern Montana, in order to claim the body of his uncle Amer.
Knowing how important hope is, keeps me looking for it in all situations. I guess that makes me a 'glass half full' type person. Know what else?...I feel like the words hope and Jesus are synonymous. If I place my hope in Jesus, then there's my reason for life and life ever-lasting!
This was not an election meeting. It was a social phenomenon. A foreigner will not understand it. Even Clinton and John McCain are finding it difficult to understand. While they appear before hundreds or a few thousands of people at most, Obama fills up stadiums. He's doing a show.A news piece in the Jerusalem Post filed from Washington D.C. (under the prominent "AMERICA DECIDES 2008: THE JEWISH ANGLE banner) by Hilary Leila Kreiger described the candidate's long-term strategy: "Barack Obama sought to use his hat trick in the so-called Potomac Primary states here on Tuesday to assert his position as the frontrunner for the Democratic presidential nomination..."
Our information is that kickbacks demanded by Musa’s agent Chia were on average RM2,500 per hectare of each concession. This amounts to billions of dollars in kickbacks given the huge areas that have been logged since Musa took power.
I stood.
He sipped from his cup of coffee, listening…waiting.
Add pickle crisp to sterilized jars according to instructions. Pack jars with vegetables. Fill packed jars with boiling liquid and seal. Make sure boiling water covers lids Place jars in pot of boiling.
Again no problems with application, and 2 coats was opaque. I have to say I’m really really impressed by Inglot, and none of the products I’ve tried so far have failed me. Now my only problem is getting my hands on more.. lol..
you just pretend it does and act normal.
Friday found me once again sending out CVs with my friend who is job-seeking. As I mentioned in my last blog, he has been made redundant for the third time in just over six months. I know from other friends who are in the same position [here in the 'prosperous South East'] it is necessary if one is lucky enough to have access to a computer to spend a lot of time each day on the JobCentre web site put up by Direct Gov. Quite a frustrating site really, but then these sort of sites always are and after one has spent a few hours reading through the jobs on offer and following up links etc the 'translations' begin to flow easily and reading between the lines becomes easy. As always what is not said is more important that what is written down.
I also loved the illustrations. I did. I thought the illustrator did a GREAT job capturing Audrey's look. If you're familiar with any of Audrey's works, you'll recognize them instantly. And there's something delightful about making that connection. "Roman Holiday!" or "My Fair Lady!" Or "Breakfast at Tiffany's!" The illustrations show her public life and her private life--as does the text.
However, if you are not comfortable being a salesman you will not be comfortable or successful being a creative director.
Some people embrace the energy of a brilliant, pure white,
Actually, I think that he is probably talking about how to be successful at anything.
Has the world changed so much, or have I?
Yesterday, I had the honor of attending the Ho-Chunk Nation Oath of Office Ceremony in Black River Falls. It was a very special ceremony, filled with emotion and gravitas, as 7 new officials accepted the responsibilities entrusted to them by the Ho-Chunk people.
Being pulled by a team of horses.
A year later, they went to see it, and they were told that the lion wouldn't remember them; see what happened thus:
The big picture? David turns 50 this March. If I remember right, back in the day the typical peak age for a male with developmental disabilities was, sadly, 20-something. My brother Walter only lived into his 30′s — tragically dying in a choking accident. This year we are getting together to have a big celebration for David’s 50th Birthday. We will all be there to celebrate the value and meaning of his life, his successes, his relationships. “C’est la vie.”
You are my Forever Faithful, and I want to spend the rest of my life learning to love You.
"Say O Muhammad (sal-Allâhu 'alayhi wa sallam): "O Allâh! Possessor of the kingdom, You give the kingdom to whom You will, and You take the kingdom from whom You will, and You endow with honour whom You will, and You humiliate whom You will. In Your Hand is the good. Verily, You are Able to do all things.
Because sometimes there are things that need to be said that I don't want to say (or hear, as the case may be).
